Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md S.F. 651 DIVISION I 1 COUNTY PROPERTY TAXES AND BUDGETS 2 Section 1. Section 331.423, subsection 1, paragraph b, 3 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 5 2024, but before July 1, 2028 2026 , subject to subparagraph 6 (3), the greater of three dollars and fifty cents per thousand 7 dollars of assessed value used to calculate taxes for general 8 county services for the budget year and the adjusted general 9 county basic levy rate, as adjusted under subparagraph (2), if 10 applicable. 11 Sec. 2. Section 331.423, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 12 2025, is amended to read as follows: 13 c. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2028, 14 three dollars and fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed 15 value. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, the greater 16 of: 17 (1) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 18 equal to one thousand multiplied by the quotient of one hundred 19 two percent of the current fiscal yearâs actual property tax 20 dollars certified for levy under this subsection 1 divided by 21 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 22 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 23 valuation. 24 (2) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 25 that results in an amount of actual property tax dollars 26 certified for levy under this subsection 1 equal to one 27 hundred and one-half percent of the actual property tax dollars 28 certified for levy under this subsection 1 for the current 29 fiscal year. 30 Sec. 3. Section 331.423, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 31 by adding the following new paragraph: 32 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) For each fiscal year beginning 33 on or after July 1, 2027, the levy rate imposed under this 34 subsection 1 for the current fiscal year, unless subject to 35 -1- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 1/ 85 S.F. 651 subparagraph (2), and for the budget year beginning July 1, 1 2027, only, not less than a levy rate per one thousand dollars 2 of assessed value that results in an amount of actual property 3 tax dollars certified for levy under this subsection 1 equal 4 to one hundred and one-half percent of the actual property tax 5 dollars certified for levy under this subsection 1 for the 6 current fiscal year. 7 (2) (a) If the total assessed value, excluding value 8 attributable to new valuation, used to calculate taxes for 9 general county services under this subsection 1 for the budget 10 year is equal to or exceeds one hundred two percent of the 11 total assessed value used to calculate taxes for general 12 county services for the current fiscal year, the levy rate 13 imposed under this subsection 1 shall not exceed a levy rate 14 per one thousand dollars of assessed value that is equal to 15 one thousand multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing 16 the product of the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the 17 current fiscal yearâs actual property tax dollars certified 18 for levy under this subsection 1 by the remainder of the total 19 assessed value used to calculate such taxes for the budget year 20 minus value attributable to new valuation. 21 (b) (i) For purposes of this subparagraph, âbudget 22 adjustment factorâ is equal to one of the following: 23 (A) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 24 all urban consumers is less than four, one hundred two percent. 25 (B) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 26 all urban consumers is equal to or greater than four but less 27 than six, one hundred three percent. 28 (C) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 29 all urban consumers is equal to or greater than six but less 30 than eight, one hundred four percent. 31 (D) If the percentage change in the consumer price index 32 for all urban consumers is equal to or greater than eight, one 33 hundred five percent. 34 (ii) The percentage change in the consumer price index for 35 -2- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 2/ 85 S.F. 651 all urban consumers shall be equal to one hundred multiplied 1 by the quotient of the remainder of the published value of the 2 consumer price index for all urban consumers for the month 3 ending six months prior to the beginning of the applicable 4 budget year minus the published value of the consumer price 5 index for all urban consumers for the month ending eighteen 6 months prior to the beginning of the applicable budget year 7 divided by the published value of the consumer price index for 8 all urban consumers for the month ending eighteen months prior 9 to the beginning of the applicable budget year. 10 Sec. 4. Section 331.423, subsection 2, paragraph b, 11 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 12 (1) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2024, 13 but before July 1, 2028 2026 , subject to subparagraph (3), the 14 greater of three dollars and ninety-five cents per thousand 15 dollars of assessed value used to calculate taxes for rural 16 county services for the budget year and the adjusted rural 17 county basic levy rate, as adjusted under subparagraph (2), if 18 applicable. 19 Sec. 5. Section 331.423, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 20 2025, is amended to read as follows: 21 c. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2028, 22 three dollars and ninety-five cents per thousand dollars of 23 assessed value. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, 24 the greater of: 25 (1) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 26 equal to one thousand multiplied by the quotient of one hundred 27 two percent of the current fiscal yearâs actual property tax 28 dollars certified for levy under this subsection 2 divided by 29 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 30 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 31 valuation. 32 (2) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 33 that results in an amount of actual property tax dollars 34 certified for levy under this subsection 2 equal to one 35 -3- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 3/ 85 S.F. 651 hundred and one-half percent of the actual property tax dollars 1 certified for levy under this subsection 2 for the current 2 fiscal year. 3 Sec. 6. Section 331.423, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 4 by adding the following new paragraph: 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) For each fiscal year beginning 6 on or after July 1, 2027, the levy rate imposed under this 7 subsection 2 for the current fiscal year, unless subject to 8 subparagraph (2), and for the budget year beginning July 1, 9 2027, only, not less than a levy rate per one thousand dollars 10 of assessed value that results in an amount of actual property 11 tax dollars certified for levy under this subsection 2 equal 12 to one hundred and one-half percent of the actual property tax 13 dollars certified for levy under this subsection 2 for the 14 current fiscal year. 15 (2) (a) If the total assessed value, excluding value 16 attributable to new valuation, used to calculate taxes for 17 rural county services under this subsection 2 for the budget 18 year is equal to or exceeds one hundred two percent of the 19 total assessed value used to calculate taxes for rural county 20 services for the current fiscal year, the levy rate imposed 21 under this subsection 2 shall not exceed a levy rate per 22 one thousand dollars of assessed value that is equal to one 23 thousand multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing the 24 product of the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the 25 current fiscal yearâs actual property tax dollars certified 26 for levy under this subsection 2 by the remainder of the total 27 assessed value used to calculate such taxes for the budget year 28 minus value attributable to new valuation. 29 (b) (i) For purposes of this subparagraph, âbudget 30 adjustment factorâ is equal to one of the following: 31 (A) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 32 all urban consumers is less than four, one hundred two percent. 33 (B) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 34 all urban consumers is equal to or greater than four but less 35 -4- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 4/ 85 S.F. 651 than six, one hundred three percent. 1 (C) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 2 all urban consumers is equal to or greater than six but less 3 than eight, one hundred four percent. 4 (D) If the percentage change in the consumer price index 5 for all urban consumers is equal to or greater than eight, one 6 hundred five percent. 7 (ii) The percentage change in the consumer price index for 8 all urban consumers shall be equal to one hundred multiplied 9 by the quotient of the remainder of the published value of the 10 consumer price index for all urban consumers for the month 11 ending six months prior to the beginning of the applicable 12 budget year minus the published value of the consumer price 13 index for all urban consumers for the month ending eighteen 14 months prior to the beginning of the applicable budget year 15 divided by the published value of the consumer price index for 16 all urban consumers for the month ending eighteen months prior 17 to the beginning of the applicable budget year. 18 Sec. 7. Section 331.423, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 19 by adding the following new paragraph: 20 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. âNew valuationâ means the increase 21 from the current fiscal year to the budget year in taxable 22 valuation, as shown on the assessment roll due to the 23 following, the amount of each as reported under section 331.510 24 by the county auditor to the department of management: 25 (1) New construction. 26 (2) Additions or improvements to existing structures that 27 are not normal and necessary repairs under section 441.21, 28 subsection 8. 29 (3) Net boundary adjustments, including annexation, 30 severance, incorporation, consolidation, or discontinuance as 31 those terms are defined in section 368.1. 32 Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 33 effect January 1, 2026. 34 Sec. 9. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 35 -5- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 5/ 85 S.F. 651 to property taxes and budgets for fiscal years beginning on or 1 after July 1, 2026. 2 DIVISION II 3 CITY PROPERTY TAXES AND BUDGETS 4 Sec. 10. Section 384.1, subsection 3, paragraph c, 5 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 6 (1) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 7 2024, but before July 1, 2028 2026 , subject to subparagraph 8 (3), a cityâs tax levy for the general fund, except for levies 9 authorized in section 384.12 , shall not exceed in any tax year 10 the greater of eight dollars and ten cents per thousand dollars 11 of assessed value used to calculate taxes for the budget year 12 and the adjusted city general fund levy rate, as adjusted under 13 subparagraph (2), if applicable. 14 Sec. 11. Section 384.1, subsection 3, paragraph d, Code 15 2025, is amended to read as follows: 16 d. (1) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 17 2028, a cityâs tax levy rate for the general fund, except for 18 levies authorized in section 384.12 , shall not exceed eight 19 dollars and ten cents per thousand dollars of assessed value 20 used to calculate taxes in any fiscal year. For the fiscal 21 year beginning July 1, 2026, a cityâs tax levy rate for the 22 general fund, except for levies authorized in section 384.12, 23 shall not exceed the greater of: 24 (a) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 25 equal to one thousand multiplied by the quotient of one hundred 26 two percent of the current fiscal yearâs actual property tax 27 dollars certified for levy under this subsection divided by 28 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 29 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 30 valuation. 31 (b) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 32 that results in an amount of actual property tax dollars 33 certified for levy under this subsection equal to one hundred 34 and one-half percent of the actual property tax dollars 35 -6- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 6/ 85 S.F. 651 certified for levy under this subsection for the current fiscal 1 year. 2 (2) Notwithstanding other provisions of this paragraph, 3 if a cityâs actual levy rate for the current fiscal year is 4 zero dollars per one thousand dollars of assessed value, a levy 5 rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value equal to one 6 thousand multiplied by the quotient of one hundred two percent 7 of the cityâs certified general fund budget for the current 8 fiscal year divided by the remainder of the total assessed 9 value used to calculate taxes for the budget year minus value 10 attributable to new valuation. 11 Sec. 12. Section 384.1, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 12 by adding the following new paragraph: 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. (1) For each fiscal year beginning on 14 or after July 1, 2027, a cityâs tax levy rate for the general 15 fund, except for levies authorized in section 384.12, shall 16 not exceed the levy rate imposed under this subsection for the 17 current fiscal year, unless subject to subparagraph (2), and 18 for the budget year beginning July 1, 2027, only, not less than 19 a levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value that 20 results in an amount of actual property tax dollars certified 21 for levy under this subsection equal to one hundred and 22 one-half percent of the actual property tax dollars certified 23 for levy under this subsection for the current fiscal year. 24 (2) (a) If the total assessed value, excluding value 25 attributable to new valuation, used to calculate taxes under 26 this subsection for the budget year is equal to or exceeds 27 one hundred two percent of the total assessed value used to 28 calculate taxes under this subsection for the current fiscal 29 year, the cityâs levy rate under this subsection shall not 30 exceed a levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 31 that is equal to one thousand multiplied by the quotient 32 obtained by dividing the product of the budget adjustment 33 factor multiplied by the current fiscal yearâs actual property 34 tax dollars certified for levy under this subsection by the 35 -7- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 7/ 85 S.F. 651 remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate such 1 taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 2 valuation. 3 (b) (i) For purposes of this subparagraph, âbudget 4 adjustment factorâ is equal to one of the following: 5 (A) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 6 all urban consumers is less than four, one hundred two percent. 7 (B) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 8 all urban consumers is equal to or greater than four but less 9 than six, one hundred three percent. 10 (C) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 11 all urban consumers is equal to or greater than six but less 12 than eight, one hundred four percent. 13 (D) If the percentage change in the consumer price index 14 for all urban consumers is equal to or greater than eight, one 15 hundred five percent. 16 (ii) The percentage change in the consumer price index for 17 all urban consumers shall be equal to one hundred multiplied 18 by the quotient of the remainder of the published value of the 19 consumer price index for all urban consumers for the month 20 ending six months prior to the beginning of the applicable 21 budget year minus the published value of the consumer price 22 index for all urban consumers for the month ending eighteen 23 months prior to the beginning of the applicable budget year 24 divided by the published value of the consumer price index for 25 all urban consumers for the month ending eighteen months prior 26 to the beginning of the applicable budget year. 27 (3) Notwithstanding other provisions of this paragraph, 28 if a cityâs actual levy rate for the current fiscal year is 29 zero dollars per one thousand dollars of assessed value, the 30 cityâs levy rate under this subsection shall not exceed a levy 31 rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value equal to one 32 thousand multiplied by the quotient of one hundred two percent 33 of the cityâs certified general fund budget for the current 34 fiscal year divided by the remainder of the total assessed 35 -8- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 8/ 85 S.F. 651 value used to calculate taxes for the budget year minus value 1 attributable to new valuation. 2 Sec. 13. Section 384.1, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 3 by adding the following new paragraph: 4 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. âNew valuationâ means the increase 5 from the current fiscal year to the budget year in taxable 6 valuation, as shown on the assessment roll due to the 7 following, the amount of each as reported under section 331.510 8 by the county auditor to the department of management: 9 (1) New construction. 10 (2) Additions or improvements to existing structures that 11 are not normal and necessary repairs under section 441.21, 12 subsection 8. 13 (3) Net boundary adjustments, including annexation, 14 severance, incorporation, consolidation, or discontinuance as 15 those terms are defined in section 368.1. 16 Sec. 14. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 17 effect January 1, 2026. 18 Sec. 15. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 19 to property taxes and budgets for fiscal years beginning on or 20 after July 1, 2026. 21 DIVISION III 22 SCHOOL TAXES AND BUDGETS 23 Sec. 16. Section 257.1, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 24 2025, is amended to read as follows: 25 b. (1) (a) For the budget year commencing July 1, 1999, 26 and for each succeeding budget year beginning before July 27 1, 2022, the regular program foundation base per pupil is 28 eighty-seven and five-tenths percent of the regular program 29 state cost per pupil. 30 (b) For the budget year commencing July 1, 2022, and for 31 each succeeding budget year beginning before July 1, 2026 , 32 the regular program foundation base per pupil is eighty-eight 33 and four-tenths percent of the regular program state cost per 34 pupil. 35 -9- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 9/ 85 S.F. 651 (c) For the budget year commencing July 1, 2026, and each 1 succeeding budget year, the regular program foundation base per 2 pupil is one hundred percent of the regular program state cost 3 per pupil. 4 (2) (a) For the budget year commencing July 1, 1991, and 5 for each succeeding budget year beginning before July 1, 2026, 6 the special education support services foundation base is 7 seventy-nine percent of the special education support services 8 state cost per pupil. 9 (b) For the budget year commencing July 1, 2026, and each 10 succeeding budget year, the special education support services 11 foundation base is one hundred percent of the special education 12 support services state cost per pupil. 13 (3) The combined foundation base is the sum of the regular 14 program foundation base, the special education support services 15 foundation base, the total teacher salary supplement district 16 cost, the total professional development supplement district 17 cost, the total early intervention supplement district cost, 18 the total teacher leadership supplement district cost, and the 19 total area education agency teacher salary supplement district 20 cost , and the amounts added to the combined district cost of 21 the school district for media services and educational services 22 under section 257.37 . 23 Sec. 17. Section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 24 2025, is amended to read as follows: 25 a. (1) Except as provided in subsections 2 and 3 , a school 26 district shall cause to be levied each budget year beginning 27 before July 1, 2026 , for the school general fund, a foundation 28 property tax equal to five dollars and forty cents per thousand 29 dollars of assessed valuation on all taxable property in the 30 district. The county auditor shall spread the foundation levy 31 over all taxable property in the district. 32 (2) Except as provided in subsections 2 and 3, a school 33 district shall cause to be levied for the budget year beginning 34 July 1, 2026, and each succeeding budget year, for the school 35 -10- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 10/ 85 S.F. 651 general fund, a foundation property tax equal to four dollars 1 and forty-eight and six hundred sixty-two one-thousandths cents 2 per thousand dollars of assessed valuation on all taxable 3 property in the district. The county auditor shall spread the 4 foundation levy over all taxable property in the district. 5 Sec. 18. Section 257.3, subsection 2, paragraphs a and b, 6 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 7 a. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a reorganized school 8 district for which the reorganization takes effect on or after 9 July 1, 2026, shall cause a foundation property tax of four 10 three dollars and forty sixty-six cents per thousand dollars of 11 assessed valuation to be levied on all taxable property which, 12 in the year preceding a reorganization, was within a school 13 district affected by the reorganization as defined in section 14 275.1, or in the year preceding a dissolution was a part of a 15 school district that dissolved if the dissolution proposal has 16 been approved by the director of the department of education 17 pursuant to section 275.55. 18 b. In For a reorganized school district for which the 19 reorganization took effect on or after July 1, 2026, in 20 succeeding school years, the foundation property tax levy on 21 that portion shall be increased to the rate of four dollars and 22 ninety seven cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation 23 the first succeeding year, five four dollars and fifteen 24 twenty-eight cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation 25 the second succeeding year, and five four dollars and forty 26 forty-eight and six hundred sixty-two one-thousandths cents per 27 thousand dollars of assessed valuation the third succeeding 28 year and each year thereafter under subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 29 Sec. 19. Section 257.4, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 30 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 31 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (10) The amount added to the combined 32 district cost of the school district for media services under 33 section 257.37. 34 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (11) The amount added to the combined 35 -11- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 11/ 85 S.F. 651 district cost of the school district for educational services 1 under section 257.37. 2 Sec. 20. Section 257.4, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 3 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 b. For the budget year beginning July 1, 2008, and 5 succeeding budget years beginning before July 1, 2026 , the 6 department of management shall annually determine an adjusted 7 additional property tax levy and a statewide maximum adjusted 8 additional property tax levy rate, not to exceed the statewide 9 average additional property tax levy rate, calculated by 10 dividing the total adjusted additional property tax levy 11 dollars statewide by the statewide total net taxable valuation. 12 For purposes of this paragraph, the adjusted additional 13 property tax levy shall be that portion of the additional 14 property tax levy corresponding to the state cost per pupil 15 multiplied by a school districtâs weighted enrollment, and then 16 multiplied by one hundred percent less the regular program 17 foundation base per pupil percentage pursuant to section 18 257.1 , and then reduced by the amount of the property tax 19 replacement payment to be received under section 257.16B and 20 the amount of the foundation base supplement payment to be 21 received under section 257.16D . The district shall receive 22 adjusted additional property tax levy aid in an amount equal 23 to the difference between the adjusted additional property 24 tax levy rate and the statewide maximum adjusted additional 25 property tax levy rate, as applied per thousand dollars of 26 assessed valuation on all taxable property in the district. 27 The statewide maximum adjusted additional property tax levy 28 rate shall be annually determined by the department taking 29 into account amounts allocated pursuant to section 257.15, 30 subsection 4 , and the balance of the property tax equity and 31 relief fund created in section 257.16A at the end of the 32 calendar year. 33 Sec. 21. Section 257.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 34 by adding the following new paragraph: 35 -12- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 12/ 85 S.F. 651 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. This subsection applies to budget years 1 beginning before July 1, 2026. 2 Sec. 22. Section 257.15, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2025, are 3 amended to read as follows: 4 2. Property tax adjustment aid for 1992-1993 and succeeding 5 years beginning before 2026-2027 . For the budget year beginning 6 July 1, 1992, and succeeding budget years beginning before July 7 1, 2026 , the department of education shall pay property tax 8 adjustment aid to a school district equal to the amount paid 9 to the district for the base year less an amount equal to the 10 product of the percent by which the taxable valuation in the 11 district increased, if the taxable valuation increased, from 12 January 1 of the year prior to the base year to January 1 of the 13 base year and the property tax adjustment aid. The department 14 of management shall adjust the rate of the additional property 15 tax accordingly and notify the department of education of 16 the amount of aid to be paid to each district from moneys 17 appropriated for property tax adjustment aid. 18 3. Property tax adjustment aid appropriation. There 19 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 20 department of education, for each fiscal year beginning 21 before July 1, 2026 , an amount necessary to pay property 22 tax adjustment aid to school districts under this section . 23 Property tax adjustment aid shall be paid to school districts 24 in the manner provided in section 257.16 . 25 Sec. 23. Section 257.15, subsection 4, paragraph a, 26 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (d), Code 2025, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 (d) For the budget year beginning July 1, 2009, and 29 succeeding budget years beginning before July 1, 2026 , 30 twenty-four million dollars. 31 Sec. 24. Section 257.15, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 32 2025, is amended to read as follows: 33 b. After For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 2025, 34 after lowering all school district adjusted additional property 35 -13- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 13/ 85 S.F. 651 tax levy rates to the statewide maximum adjusted additional 1 property tax levy rate under paragraph âaâ , the department of 2 management shall use any remaining funds at the end of the 3 calendar year to further lower additional property taxes by 4 increasing for the budget year beginning the following July 5 1, the regular program foundation base per pupil percentage 6 under section 257.1 . Moneys used pursuant to this paragraph 7 shall supplant an equal amount of the appropriation made from 8 the general fund of the state pursuant to section 257.16 that 9 represents the increase in state foundation aid. Any moneys 10 remaining at the conclusion of the fiscal year beginning July 11 1, 2024, shall be transferred by the department of management 12 for deposit in the general fund of the state. 13 Sec. 25. Section 257.16A, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2025, 14 are amended to read as follows: 15 2. There For each fiscal year beginning before July 1, 16 2026, there is appropriated annually all moneys in the fund to 17 the department of management for purposes of section 257.15, 18 subsection 4 . 19 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any moneys remaining in 20 the property tax equity and relief fund at the end of a fiscal 21 year shall not revert to any other fund but shall remain in the 22 property tax equity and relief fund for use as provided in this 23 section for the following fiscal year. However, at the end of 24 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, any moneys remaining in 25 the property tax equity and relief fund shall be transferred 26 for deposit into either the secure an advanced vision for 27 education fund or the general fund of the state based on the 28 fund from which the moneys were received. 29 Sec. 26. Section 257.16B, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 30 amended to read as follows: 31 1. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2022, 32 but before July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the general 33 fund of the state to the department of education an amount 34 necessary to make all school district property tax replacement 35 -14- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 14/ 85 S.F. 651 payments under this section , as calculated in subsection 2 . 1 Sec. 27. Section 257.16D, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3 a. There For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 2026, 4 there is appropriated annually from the fund to the department 5 of management an amount necessary to make all foundation base 6 supplement payments under this section . The department of 7 management shall calculate each school districtâs foundation 8 base supplement payment based on the distribution methodology 9 under paragraph âbâ . 10 Sec. 28. Section 257.16D, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 11 amended to read as follows: 12 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any moneys remaining in 13 the foundation base supplement fund at the end of a fiscal year 14 shall not revert to any other fund but shall remain in the 15 foundation base supplement fund for use as provided in this 16 section for the following fiscal year. However, at the end of 17 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, any moneys remaining in 18 the foundation base supplement fund shall be transferred for 19 deposit in the secure an advanced vision for education fund. 20 Sec. 29. Section 257.31, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 21 following new subsection: 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 19. a. The board of directors of each 23 school district with an unexpended fund balance in the 24 districtâs management levy fund under section 298A.3 at the 25 conclusion of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, that 26 exceeds an amount equal to the total expenditures from the 27 districtâs management levy fund for the fiscal year beginning 28 July 1, 2024, shall certify such unexpended fund balance and 29 expenditure amounts, including any reserved or designated 30 amounts in the fund and the purposes therefor, to the school 31 budget review committee by November 15, 2025. The committee 32 shall prescribe the form for such certifications. 33 b. The committee shall conduct a review of the unexpended 34 fund balances and expenditures of school district management 35 -15- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 15/ 85 S.F. 651 levy funds certified under paragraph âaâ . The committee 1 shall consult with boards of directors of school districts 2 and other relevant persons to determine the appropriateness 3 of establishing district management levy fund unexpended fund 4 balance limitations. By February 1, 2026, the committee 5 shall make recommendations to the general assembly for 6 establishing district management levy fund unexpended fund 7 balance limitations for fiscal years beginning on or after July 8 1, 2027, including recommendations for limitations based on a 9 percentage of the districtâs management levy fund expenditures 10 and recommendations for management levy limitations and 11 expenditure requirements for excess funds. 12 Sec. 30. Section 298.2, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 1. a. A physical plant and equipment levy of not exceeding 15 one dollar and sixty-seven eighteen cents per thousand dollars 16 of assessed valuation in the district is established except 17 as otherwise provided in this subsection . The physical plant 18 and equipment levy consists of the regular physical plant and 19 equipment levy of not exceeding thirty-three twenty-four cents 20 per thousand dollars of assessed valuation in the district 21 and a voter-approved physical plant and equipment levy of 22 not exceeding one dollar and thirty-four ninety-four cents 23 per thousand dollars of assessed valuation in the district. 24 However, the voter-approved physical plant and equipment levy 25 may consist of a combination of a physical plant and equipment 26 property tax levy and a physical plant and equipment income 27 surtax as provided in subsection 4 with the maximum amount 28 levied and imposed limited to an amount that could be raised 29 by a one dollar and thirty-four ninety-four cent property tax 30 levy. A voter-approved physical plant and equipment levy 31 approved prior to the effective date of this division of this 32 Act shall not exceed a rate that is seventy percent of the rate 33 approved at election. 34 b. For school budget years beginning on or after July 1, 35 -16- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 16/ 85 S.F. 651 2015 2026 , a school district may by resolution of the board of 1 directors adopted prior to April 30 preceding the budget year 2 impose a physical plant and equipment levy at a rate in excess 3 of the levy rate limitations under paragraph âaâ if the board 4 has refunded or refinanced a loan agreement entered into under 5 section 297.36 and such refunding or refinancing complies with 6 the maturity period authorized under section 297.36, subsection 7 1 , paragraph âcâ , and results in a lower amount of interest on 8 the amount of the loan agreement. However, the rate imposed 9 by a school district under this paragraph shall not exceed the 10 rate imposed during the budget year in which the loan agreement 11 was refunded or refinanced or seventy percent of such levy 12 rate if the refunding or refinancing occurred in the budget 13 year beginning July 1, 2025 . Authorization to exceed the levy 14 rate limitations of paragraph âaâ shall terminate upon the 15 maturity of the loan agreement after refunding or refinancing. 16 Upon adoption of the resolution under this paragraph âbâ , the 17 board shall comply with the requirements of section 297.36, 18 subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ . 19 Sec. 31. Section 298.2, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 20 by striking the subsection. 21 Sec. 32. Section 298.4, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 22 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 23 The Unless prohibited by subsection 1A, paragraph âaâ , the 24 board of directors of a school district may certify for levy by 25 April 30 of a school year, a tax on all taxable property in the 26 school district for a district management levy , subject to the 27 limitations in subsection 1A, paragraph âbâ . The revenue from 28 the tax levied in this section shall be placed in the district 29 management levy fund of the school district. The district 30 management levy shall be expended only for the following 31 purposes: 32 Sec. 33. Section 298.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 33 following new subsection: 34 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. a. (1) For the fiscal year beginning 35 -17- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 17/ 85 S.F. 651 July 1, 2027, if a school districtâs unexpended fund balance, 1 as defined in section 257.2, of the districtâs management levy 2 fund is equal to or exceeds one hundred eighty percent of the 3 average annual expenditures from the districtâs management 4 levy fund for the three consecutive fiscal years immediately 5 preceding the base year, the board of directors shall not 6 certify a levy under this section for the fiscal year. 7 (2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028, if a school 8 districtâs unexpended fund balance, as defined in section 9 257.2, of the districtâs management levy fund is equal to or 10 exceeds one hundred seventy-five percent of the average annual 11 expenditures from the districtâs management levy fund for the 12 three consecutive fiscal years immediately preceding the base 13 year, the board of directors shall not certify a levy under 14 this section for the fiscal year. 15 (3) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2029, if a school 16 districtâs unexpended fund balance, as defined in section 17 257.2, of the districtâs management levy fund is equal to or 18 exceeds one hundred seventy percent of the average annual 19 expenditures from the districtâs management levy fund for the 20 three consecutive fiscal years immediately preceding the base 21 year, the board of directors shall not certify a levy under 22 this section for the fiscal year. 23 (4) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2030, if a school 24 districtâs unexpended fund balance, as defined in section 25 257.2, of the districtâs management levy fund is equal to or 26 exceeds one hundred sixty-five percent of the average annual 27 expenditures from the districtâs management levy fund for the 28 three consecutive fiscal years immediately preceding the base 29 year, the board of directors shall not certify a levy under 30 this section for the fiscal year. 31 (5) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2031, and each 32 succeeding fiscal year, if a school districtâs unexpended 33 fund balance, as defined in section 257.2, of the districtâs 34 management levy fund is equal to or exceeds one hundred sixty 35 -18- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 18/ 85 S.F. 651 percent of the average annual expenditures from the districtâs 1 management levy fund for the three consecutive fiscal years 2 immediately preceding the base year, the board of directors 3 shall not certify a levy under this section for the fiscal 4 year. 5 b. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, if 6 a school district is not prohibited from certifying a levy 7 pursuant to paragraph âaâ , the maximum amount that the board of 8 directors may certify for levy under this section shall be an 9 amount equal to the remainder of one hundred eighty percent of 10 the average annual expenditures from the districtâs management 11 levy fund for the three consecutive fiscal years immediately 12 preceding the base year minus the districtâs management levy 13 fund unexpended fund balance for the fiscal year preceding the 14 base year. 15 (2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028, if a school 16 district is not prohibited from certifying a levy pursuant to 17 paragraph âaâ , the maximum amount that the board of directors 18 may certify for levy under this section shall be an amount 19 equal to the remainder of one hundred seventy-five percent of 20 the average annual expenditures from the districtâs management 21 levy fund for the three consecutive fiscal years immediately 22 preceding the base year minus the districtâs management levy 23 fund unexpended fund balance for the fiscal year preceding the 24 base year. 25 (3) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2029, if a school 26 district is not prohibited from certifying a levy pursuant to 27 paragraph âaâ , the maximum amount that the board of directors 28 may certify for levy under this section shall be an amount 29 equal to the remainder of one hundred seventy percent of the 30 average annual expenditures from the districtâs management 31 levy fund for the three consecutive fiscal years immediately 32 preceding the base year minus the districtâs management levy 33 fund unexpended fund balance for the fiscal year preceding the 34 base year. 35 -19- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 19/ 85 S.F. 651 (4) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2030, if a school 1 district is not prohibited from certifying a levy pursuant to 2 paragraph âaâ , the maximum amount that the board of directors 3 may certify for levy under this section shall be an amount 4 equal to the remainder of one hundred sixty-five percent of 5 the average annual expenditures from the districtâs management 6 levy fund for the three consecutive fiscal years immediately 7 preceding the base year minus the districtâs management levy 8 fund unexpended fund balance for the fiscal year preceding the 9 base year. 10 (5) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2031, and each 11 succeeding fiscal year, if a school district is not prohibited 12 from certifying a levy pursuant to paragraph âaâ , the maximum 13 amount that the board of directors may certify for levy under 14 this section shall be an amount equal to the remainder of one 15 hundred sixty percent of the average annual expenditures from 16 the districtâs management levy fund for the three consecutive 17 fiscal years immediately preceding the base year minus the 18 districtâs management levy fund unexpended fund balance for the 19 fiscal year preceding the base year. 20 Sec. 34. Section 298.18, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 21 2025, is amended to read as follows: 22 d. The amount estimated and certified to apply on principal 23 and interest for any one year may exceed two dollars and 24 seventy one dollar and eighty-nine cents per thousand dollars 25 of assessed value by the amount approved by the voters of the 26 school corporation, but not exceeding four two dollars and five 27 eighty-four cents per thousand dollars of the assessed value of 28 the taxable property within any school corporation, provided 29 that the registered voters of such school corporation have 30 first approved such increased amount at an election held on a 31 date specified in section 39.2, subsection 4 , paragraph âcâ . 32 Amounts approved at election before the effective date of this 33 division of this Act shall not exceed a rate that is seventy 34 percent of the rate approved at election. 35 -20- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 20/ 85 S.F. 651 Sec. 35. Section 423F.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) Prior to distribution of moneys in the secure an 3 advanced vision for education fund to school districts, an 4 amount equal to the equity transfer amount for the fiscal year 5 minus the foundation base transfer amount for the fiscal year 6 shall be distributed and credited to the property tax equity 7 and relief fund created in section 257.16A , an amount equal 8 to the foundation base transfer amount shall be distributed 9 and credited to the foundation base supplement fund created 10 in section 257.16D , general fund of the state to be used for 11 foundation aid resulting from the increase in the regular 12 program foundation base per pupil to one hundred percent of the 13 regular program state cost per pupil and an amount equal to 14 the career academy transfer amount for the fiscal year shall 15 be distributed and credited to the career academy fund created 16 in section 257.51 . 17 Sec. 36. Section 423F.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, 18 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 19 subparagraph. 20 Sec. 37. Section 423F.3, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 21 2025, is amended to read as follows: 22 a. Reduction of the bond levies levy under sections section 23 298.18 and 298.18A and all other debt levies. 24 Sec. 38. Section 425A.3, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 1. The family farm tax credit fund shall be apportioned 27 each year in the manner provided in this chapter so as to give 28 a credit against the tax on each eligible tract of agricultural 29 land within the several school districts of the state in which 30 the levy for the general school fund exceeds five dollars and 31 forty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value the levy 32 rate under section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . The 33 amount of the credit on each eligible tract of agricultural 34 land shall be the amount the tax levied for the general school 35 -21- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 21/ 85 S.F. 651 fund exceeds the amount of tax which would be levied on each 1 eligible tract of agricultural land were the levy for the 2 general school fund five dollars and forty cents per thousand 3 dollars of assessed value the levy rate under section 257.3, 4 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , for the previous year. However, 5 in the case of a deficiency in the family farm tax credit fund 6 to pay the credits in full, the credit on each eligible tract 7 of agricultural land in the state shall be proportionate and 8 applied as provided in this chapter . 9 Sec. 39. Section 425A.5, Code 2025, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 425A.5 Computation by county auditor. 12 The family farm tax credit allowed each year shall be 13 computed as follows: On or before April 1, the county auditor 14 shall list by school districts all tracts of agricultural 15 land which are entitled to credit, the taxable value for the 16 previous year, the budget from each school district for the 17 previous year, and the tax rate determined for the general 18 fund of the school district in the manner prescribed in 19 section 444.3 for the previous year, and if the tax rate is in 20 excess of five dollars and forty cents per thousand dollars of 21 assessed value the levy rate under section 257.3, subsection 22 1, paragraph âaâ , the auditor shall multiply the tax levy which 23 is in excess of five dollars and forty cents per thousand 24 dollars of assessed value the levy rate under section 257.3, 25 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , by the total taxable value of the 26 agricultural land entitled to credit in the school district, 27 and on or before April 1, certify the total amount of credit 28 and the total number of acres entitled to the credit to the 29 department of revenue. 30 Sec. 40. Section 426.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 426.3 Where credit given. 33 The agricultural land credit fund shall be apportioned each 34 year in the manner hereinafter provided so as to give a credit 35 -22- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 22/ 85 S.F. 651 against the tax on each tract of agricultural lands within the 1 several school districts of the state in which the levy for 2 the general school fund exceeds five dollars and forty cents 3 per thousand dollars of assessed value the levy rate under 4 section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ ; the amount of such 5 credit on each tract of such lands shall be the amount the tax 6 levied for the general school fund exceeds the amount of tax 7 which would be levied on said tract of such lands were the 8 levy for the general school fund five dollars and forty cents 9 per thousand dollars of assessed value the levy rate under 10 section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , for the previous 11 year, except in the case of a deficiency in the agricultural 12 land credit fund to pay said credits in full, in which case the 13 credit on each eligible tract of such lands in the state shall 14 be proportionate and shall be applied as hereinafter provided. 15 Sec. 41. Section 426.6, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 1. The agricultural land tax credit allowed each year 18 shall be computed as follows: On or before April 1, the 19 county auditor shall list by school districts all tracts of 20 agricultural lands which are entitled to credit, together with 21 the taxable value for the previous year, together with the 22 budget from each school district for the previous year, and the 23 tax rate determined for the general fund of the district in 24 the manner prescribed in section 444.3 for the previous year, 25 and if such tax rate is in excess of five dollars and forty 26 cents per thousand dollars of assessed value the levy rate 27 under section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , the auditor 28 shall multiply the tax levy which is in excess of five dollars 29 and forty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value the 30 levy rate under section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , by 31 the total taxable value of the agricultural lands entitled to 32 credit in the district, and on or before April 1, certify the 33 amount to the department of revenue. 34 Sec. 42. REPEAL. Section 298.18A, Code 2025, is repealed. 35 -23- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 23/ 85 S.F. 651 Sec. 43. ADJUSTMENT OF CALCULATIONS. For property tax 1 credits under chapters 425A and 426 for property taxes due and 2 payable in the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, the tax rate 3 determined for the general fund of the school district in the 4 manner prescribed in section 444.3 for the previous year shall 5 be determined using the appropriate property tax levy rate 6 under section 257.3, as amended in this division of this Act. 7 Sec. 44. EFFECTIVE DATE. Except for the section of this 8 division of this Act amending section 257.31, this division of 9 this Act takes effect January 1, 2026. 10 Sec. 45. APPLICABILITY. Except for the section of this 11 division of this Act amending section 257.31, this division 12 of this Act applies to fiscal years and school budget years 13 beginning on or after July 1, 2026. 14 DIVISION IV 15 PROPERTY CLASSIFICATIONS, VALUATIONS, AND ASSESSMENT 16 LIMITATIONS 17 Sec. 46. Section 386.8, Code 2025, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 386.8 Operation tax. 20 A city may establish a self-supported improvement district 21 operation fund, and may certify taxes not to exceed the 22 rate limitation as established in the ordinance creating the 23 district, or any amendment thereto, each year to be levied 24 for the fund against all of the property in the district, 25 for the purpose of paying the administrative expenses of 26 the district, which may include but are not limited to 27 administrative personnel salaries, a separate administrative 28 office, planning costs including consultation fees, engineering 29 fees, architectural fees, and legal fees and all other expenses 30 reasonably associated with the administration of the district 31 and the fulfilling of the purposes of the district. The taxes 32 levied for this fund may also be used for the purpose of paying 33 maintenance expenses of improvements or self-liquidating 34 improvements for a specified length of time with one or more 35 -24- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 24/ 85 S.F. 651 options to renew if such is clearly stated in the petition 1 which requests the council to authorize construction of the 2 improvement or self-liquidating improvement, whether or not 3 such petition is combined with the petition requesting creation 4 of a district. Parcels of property which are assessed as 5 residential property for property tax purposes are exempt from 6 the tax levied under this section except residential properties 7 within a duly designated historic district or property 8 classified as residential multiresidential property under 9 section 441.21, subsection 14 13 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph 10 (6) (5) . A tax levied under this section is not subject to the 11 levy limitation in section 384.1 . 12 Sec. 47. Section 386.9, Code 2025, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 386.9 Capital improvement tax. 15 A city may establish a capital improvement fund for a 16 district and may certify taxes, not to exceed the rate 17 established by the ordinance creating the district, or any 18 subsequent amendment thereto, each year to be levied for 19 the fund against all of the property in the district, for 20 the purpose of accumulating moneys for the financing or 21 payment of a part or all of the costs of any improvement or 22 self-liquidating improvement. However, parcels of property 23 which are assessed as residential property for property tax 24 purposes are exempt from the tax levied under this section 25 except residential properties within a duly designated historic 26 district or property classified as residential multiresidential 27 property under section 441.21, subsection 14 13 , paragraph âaâ , 28 subparagraph (6) (5) . A tax levied under this section is not 29 subject to the levy limitations in section 384.1 or 384.7 . 30 Sec. 48. Section 386.10, Code 2025, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 386.10 Debt service tax. 33 A city shall establish a self-supported municipal 34 improvement district debt service fund whenever any 35 -25- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 25/ 85 S.F. 651 self-supported municipal improvement district bonds are issued 1 and outstanding, other than revenue bonds, and shall certify 2 taxes to be levied against all of the property in the district 3 for the debt service fund in the amount necessary to pay 4 interest as it becomes due and the amount necessary to pay, 5 or to create a sinking fund to pay, the principal at maturity 6 of all self-supported municipal improvement district bonds as 7 authorized in section 386.11 , issued by the city. However, 8 parcels of property which are assessed as residential property 9 for property tax purposes at the time of the issuance of the 10 bonds are exempt from the tax levied under this section until 11 the parcels are no longer assessed as residential property 12 or until the residential properties are designated as a part 13 of a historic district or property classified as residential 14 multiresidential property under section 441.21, subsection 14 15 13 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (6) (5) . 16 Sec. 49. Section 404.2, subsection 2, paragraph f, Code 17 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 f. A statement specifying whether the revitalization is 19 applicable to none, some, or all of the property assessed as 20 residential, multiresidential, agricultural, commercial, or 21 industrial property within the designated area or a combination 22 thereof and whether the revitalization is for rehabilitation 23 and additions to existing buildings or new construction or 24 both. If revitalization is made applicable only to some 25 property within an assessment classification, the definition of 26 that subset of eligible property must be by uniform criteria 27 which further some planning objective identified in the plan. 28 The city shall state how long it is estimated that the area 29 shall remain a designated revitalization area which time 30 shall be longer than one year from the date of designation 31 and shall state any plan by the city to issue revenue bonds 32 for revitalization projects within the area. For a county, 33 a revitalization area shall include only property which 34 will be used as industrial property, commercial property, 35 -26- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 26/ 85 S.F. 651 multiresidential property, or residential property. However, a 1 county shall not provide a tax exemption under this chapter to 2 commercial property , multiresidential property, or residential 3 property which is located within the limits of a city. 4 Sec. 50. Section 404.3, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 5 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 6 lieu thereof the following: 7 a. All qualified real estate assessed as any of the 8 following is eligible to receive a one hundred percent 9 exemption from taxation on the actual value added by the 10 improvements: 11 (1) Residential property. 12 (2) Commercial property if the commercial property 13 consists of three or more separate living quarters with at 14 least seventy-five percent of the space used for residential 15 purposes. 16 (3) Multiresidential property if the multiresidential 17 property consists of three or more separate living quarters 18 with at least seventy-five percent of the space used for 19 residential purposes. 20 Sec. 51. Section 404.3A, Code 2025, is amended to read as 21 follows: 22 404.3A Residential development area exemption. 23 Notwithstanding the schedules provided for in section 404.3 , 24 all qualified real estate assessed as residential property or 25 multiresidential property , excluding property classified as 26 residential multiresidential property under section 441.21, 27 subsection 14 13 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (6) (5) , in an 28 area designated under section 404.1, subsection 5 , is eligible 29 to receive an exemption from taxation on the first seventy-five 30 thousand dollars of actual value added by the improvements. 31 The exemption is for a period of five years. 32 Sec. 52. Section 404.3D, Code 2025, is amended to read as 33 follows: 34 404.3D Exemptions for residential and multiresidential 35 -27- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 27/ 85 S.F. 651 property. 1 For revitalization areas established under this chapter 2 on or after July 1, 2024, and for first-year exemption 3 applications for property located in a revitalization area in 4 existence on July 1, 2024, filed on or after July 1, 2024, an 5 exemption authorized under this chapter for property that is 6 residential property or multiresidential property shall not 7 apply to property tax levies imposed by a school district. 8 Sec. 53. Section 441.21, subsection 1, paragraph b, 9 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 10 (1) The actual value of all property subject to assessment 11 and taxation shall be the fair and reasonable market value of 12 such property except as otherwise provided in this section . 13 âMarket valueâ is defined as the fair and reasonable exchange 14 in the year in which the property is listed and valued between 15 a willing buyer and a willing seller, neither being under any 16 compulsion to buy or sell and each being familiar with all 17 the facts relating to the particular property. Sale prices 18 of the property or comparable property in normal transactions 19 reflecting market value, and the probable availability 20 or unavailability of persons interested in purchasing the 21 property, shall be taken into consideration in arriving at 22 its market value. In arriving at market value, sale prices 23 of property in abnormal transactions not reflecting market 24 value shall not be taken into account, or shall be adjusted to 25 eliminate the effect of factors which distort market value, 26 including but not limited to built-to-suit construction, 27 sale-leaseback transactions, leased fee sales, sales to 28 immediate family of the seller between related parties , 29 foreclosure or other forced sales, contract sales, discounted 30 purchase transactions or purchase of adjoining land or other 31 land to be operated as a unit. 32 Sec. 54. Section 441.21, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 33 2025, is amended to read as follows: 34 e. The actual value of agricultural property shall be 35 -28- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 28/ 85 S.F. 651 determined on the basis of productivity and net earning 1 capacity of the property determined on the basis of its use for 2 agricultural purposes capitalized at a rate of seven percent 3 and applied uniformly among counties and among classes of 4 property. However, for assessment years beginning on or after 5 January 1, 2026, structures on agricultural land constructed on 6 or after January 1, 2026, that are not agricultural dwellings 7 shall not be included in determination of productivity and 8 net earning capacity of agricultural property and shall not 9 be allocated any portion of the total county productivity 10 value so determined. However, such structures shall be 11 treated similarly to agricultural structures constructed 12 before January 1, 2026, when applying any equalization 13 order of the department. Such agricultural structures shall 14 instead be valued according to the structureâs replacement 15 cost less depreciation and obsolescence and the structureâs 16 assessed value subject to taxation prior to application of any 17 assessment limitation under subsection 4 shall be equal to the 18 product of the structureâs value multiplied by the agricultural 19 factor, as determined in 701 IAC 102.3(2) or succeeding rule of 20 the department. Any formula or method employed to determine 21 productivity and net earning capacity of property shall be 22 adopted in full by rule. 23 Sec. 55. Section 441.21, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 24 to read as follows: 25 2. In the event market value of the property being assessed 26 cannot be readily established in the foregoing manner, then 27 the assessor may determine the value of the property using the 28 other uniform and recognized appraisal methods including its 29 productive and earning capacity, if any, industrial conditions, 30 its cost, physical and functional depreciation and obsolescence 31 and replacement cost, and all other factors which would assist 32 in determining the fair and reasonable market value of the 33 property but the actual value shall not be determined by use 34 of only one such factor. The following shall not be taken into 35 -29- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 29/ 85 S.F. 651 consideration: Special value or use value of the property to 1 its present owner, and the goodwill or value of a business 2 which uses the property as distinguished from the value of 3 the property as property. In addition, for assessment years 4 beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and unless otherwise 5 required for property valued by the department of revenue 6 pursuant to chapters 428 , 437 , and 438 , the assessor shall not 7 take into consideration and shall not request from any person 8 sales or receipts data, expense data, balance sheets, bank 9 account information, or other data related to the financial 10 condition of a business operating in whole or in part on the 11 property if the property is both classified as commercial or 12 industrial property and owned and used by the owner of the 13 business. However, in assessing property that is rented or 14 leased to low-income individuals and families as authorized by 15 section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, and which 16 section limits the amount that the individual or family pays 17 for the rental or lease of units in the property, the assessor 18 shall, unless the owner elects to withdraw the property from 19 the assessment procedures for section 42 property, use the 20 productive and earning capacity from the actual rents received 21 as a method of appraisal and shall take into account the extent 22 to which that use and limitation reduces the market value of 23 the property. The assessor shall not consider any tax credit 24 equity or other subsidized financing as income provided to 25 the property in determining the assessed value. The property 26 owner shall notify the assessor when property is withdrawn 27 from section 42 eligibility under the Internal Revenue Code 28 or if the owner elects to withdraw the property from the 29 assessment procedures for section 42 property under this 30 subsection . The property shall not be subject to section 42 31 assessment procedures for the assessment year for which section 32 42 eligibility is withdrawn or an election is made. This 33 notification must be provided to the assessor no later than 34 March 1 of the assessment year or the owner will be subject to a 35 -30- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 30/ 85 S.F. 651 penalty of five hundred dollars for that assessment year. The 1 penalty shall be collected at the same time and in the same 2 manner as regular property taxes. An election to withdraw 3 from the assessment procedures for section 42 property is 4 irrevocable. Property that is withdrawn from the assessment 5 procedures for section 42 property shall be classified and 6 assessed as residential multiresidential property unless the 7 property otherwise fails to meet the requirements of subsection 8 14 13 . Upon adoption of uniform rules by the department of 9 revenue or succeeding authority covering assessments and 10 valuations of such properties, the valuation on such properties 11 shall be determined in accordance with such rules and in 12 accordance with forms and guidelines contained in the real 13 property appraisal manual prepared by the department as updated 14 from time to time for assessment purposes to assure uniformity, 15 but such rules, forms, and guidelines shall not be inconsistent 16 with or change the foregoing means of determining the actual, 17 market, taxable, and assessed values. 18 Sec. 56. Section 441.21, subsections 4 and 5, Code 2025, are 19 amended to read as follows: 20 4. For valuations established as of January 1, 1979 2025 , 21 the percentage of actual value at which agricultural and 22 residential property shall be assessed shall be the quotient of 23 the dividend and divisor as defined in this section determined 24 under this subsection . 25 a. (1) The percentage of actual value at which agricultural 26 property shall be assessed shall be the quotient of the 27 dividend and divisor as defined in this paragraph. The 28 dividend for each class of property shall be the dividend 29 as determined for each class of agricultural property 30 for valuations established as of January 1, 1978 2024 , as 31 determined under the applicable law for that assessment year, 32 adjusted by the product obtained by multiplying the percentage 33 determined for that year by the amount of any additions or 34 deletions to actual value, excluding those resulting from 35 -31- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 31/ 85 S.F. 651 the revaluation of existing properties, as reported by the 1 assessors on the abstracts of assessment for 1978 2024 , plus 2 six three percent of the amount so determined. 3 (2) However, if the difference between the dividend so 4 determined for either class of property and the dividend for 5 that class of property for valuations established as of January 6 1, 1978, adjusted by the product obtained by multiplying 7 the percentage determined for that year by the amount of 8 any additions or deletions to actual value, excluding those 9 resulting from the revaluation of existing properties, as 10 reported by the assessors on the abstracts of assessment for 11 1978, is less than six percent, the 1979 dividend for the other 12 class of property shall be the dividend as determined for that 13 class of property for valuations established as of January 14 1, 1978, adjusted by the product obtained by multiplying 15 the percentage determined for that year by the amount of 16 any additions or deletions to actual value, excluding those 17 resulting from the revaluation of existing properties, as 18 reported by the assessors on the abstracts of assessment for 19 1978, plus a percentage of the amount so determined which is 20 equal to the percentage by which the dividend as determined 21 for the other class of property for valuations established 22 as of January 1, 1978, adjusted by the product obtained by 23 multiplying the percentage determined for that year by the 24 amount of any additions or deletions to actual value, excluding 25 those resulting from the revaluation of existing properties, as 26 reported by the assessors on the abstracts of assessment for 27 1978, is increased in arriving at the 1979 dividend for the 28 other class of property. 29 (3) For valuations established for assessment years 30 beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the calculation of the 31 dividend for residential property under this subsection shall 32 exclude the value of all property described in subsection 14 , 33 paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6), 34 and the property described in subsection 14 , paragraph âaâ , 35 -32- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 32/ 85 S.F. 651 subparagraph (7), that contains three or more separate dwelling 1 units. 2 b. (1) The divisor for each class of property shall be 3 the total actual value of all such agricultural property in 4 the state in the preceding year, as reported by the assessors 5 on the abstracts of assessment submitted for 1978 2024 , as 6 determined under the applicable law for that assessment year, 7 plus the amount of value added to said total actual value 8 by the revaluation of existing properties in 1979 2025 as 9 equalized by the director of revenue pursuant to section 10 441.49 . The director shall utilize information reported on 11 abstracts of assessment submitted pursuant to section 441.45 12 in determining such percentage. For valuations established as 13 of January 1, 2026, and each assessment year thereafter, the 14 percentage of actual value as equalized by the department of 15 revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which agricultural 16 property shall be assessed shall be calculated in accordance 17 with the methods provided in this paragraph. 18 (2) For valuations established for assessment years 19 beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the calculation of the 20 divisor for residential property under this subsection shall 21 exclude the value of all property described in subsection 14 , 22 paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6), 23 and the property described in subsection 14 , paragraph âaâ , 24 subparagraph (7), that contains three or more separate dwelling 25 units. 26 c. (1) For valuations established as of January 1, 1980, 27 and each assessment year thereafter beginning before January 28 1, 2013, the percentage of actual value as equalized by the 29 director of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which 30 agricultural and residential property shall be assessed shall 31 be calculated in accordance with the methods provided in 32 this subsection , including the limitation of increases in 33 agricultural and residential assessed values to the percentage 34 increase of the other class of property if the other class 35 -33- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 33/ 85 S.F. 651 increases less than the allowable limit adjusted to include 1 the applicable and current values as equalized by the director 2 of revenue, except that any references to six percent in this 3 subsection shall be four percent. 4 (2) For valuations established as of January 1, 2013, and 5 each assessment year thereafter, the percentage of actual 6 value as equalized by the department of revenue as provided in 7 section 441.49 at which agricultural and residential property 8 shall be assessed shall be calculated in accordance with the 9 methods provided in this subsection , including the limitation 10 of increases in agricultural and residential assessed values to 11 the percentage increase of the other class of property if the 12 other class increases less than the allowable limit adjusted 13 to include the applicable and current values as equalized by 14 the department of revenue, except that any references to six 15 percent in this subsection shall be three percent. 16 b. (1) For valuations established for the assessment year 17 beginning January 1, 2024, the percentage of actual value 18 as equalized by the department of revenue as provided in 19 section 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed 20 shall be forty-seven and four thousand three hundred sixteen 21 ten-thousandths percent. 22 (2) For valuations established for the assessment year 23 beginning January 1, 2025, and the assessment year beginning 24 January 1, 2026, the percentage of actual value as equalized 25 by the department of revenue as provided in section 441.49 26 at which residential property shall be assessed shall be 27 seventy-five percent. 28 (3) For valuations established for the assessment year 29 beginning January 1, 2027, the percentage of actual value as 30 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 31 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall be 32 seventy-seven and one-half percent. 33 (4) For valuations established for the assessment year 34 beginning January 1, 2028, the percentage of actual value as 35 -34- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 34/ 85 S.F. 651 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 1 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 2 be eighty percent. 3 (5) For valuations established for the assessment year 4 beginning January 1, 2029, the percentage of actual value as 5 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 6 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall be 7 eighty-two and one-half percent. 8 (6) For valuations established for the assessment year 9 beginning January 1, 2030, the percentage of actual value as 10 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 11 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 12 be eighty-five percent. 13 (7) For valuations established for the assessment year 14 beginning January 1, 2031, the percentage of actual value as 15 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 16 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall be 17 eighty-seven and one-half percent. 18 (8) For valuations established for the assessment year 19 beginning January 1, 2032, the percentage of actual value as 20 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 21 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 22 be ninety percent. 23 (9) For valuations established for the assessment year 24 beginning January 1, 2033, the percentage of actual value as 25 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 26 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall be 27 ninety-two and one-half percent. 28 (10) For valuations established for the assessment year 29 beginning January 1, 2034, the percentage of actual value as 30 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 31 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 32 be ninety-five percent. 33 (11) For valuations established for the assessment year 34 beginning January 1, 2035, the percentage of actual value as 35 -35- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 35/ 85 S.F. 651 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 1 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall be 2 ninety-seven and one-half percent. 3 (12) For valuations established for the assessment year 4 beginning January 1, 2036, and each assessment year thereafter, 5 the percentage of actual value as equalized by the department 6 of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which residential 7 property shall be assessed shall be one hundred percent. 8 5. a. (1) For valuations established as of January 1, 9 1979, property valued by the department of revenue pursuant to 10 chapter 437 shall be considered as one class of property and 11 shall be assessed as a percentage of its actual value. The 12 percentage shall be determined by the director of revenue in 13 accordance with the provisions of this section . For valuations 14 established as of January 1, 1979, the percentage shall be 15 the quotient of the dividend and divisor as defined in this 16 section . The dividend shall be the total actual valuation 17 established for 1978 by the department of revenue, plus ten 18 percent of the amount so determined. The divisor for property 19 valued by the department of revenue pursuant to chapter 437 20 shall be the valuation established for 1978, plus the amount of 21 value added to the total actual value by the revaluation of the 22 property by the department of revenue as of January 1, 1979. 23 For valuations established as of January 1, 1980, property 24 valued by the department of revenue pursuant to chapter 437 25 shall be assessed at a percentage of its actual value. The 26 percentage shall be determined by the director of revenue in 27 accordance with the provisions of this section . For valuations 28 established as of January 1, 1980, the percentage shall be 29 the quotient of the dividend and divisor as defined in this 30 section . The dividend shall be the total actual valuation 31 established for 1979 by the department of revenue, plus eight 32 percent of the amount so determined. The divisor for property 33 valued by the department of revenue pursuant to chapter 437 34 shall be the valuation established for 1979, plus the amount of 35 -36- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 36/ 85 S.F. 651 value added to the total actual value by the revaluation of the 1 property by the department of revenue as of January 1, 1980. 2 For valuations established as of January 1, 1981, and each year 3 thereafter, the percentage of actual value at which property 4 valued by the department of revenue pursuant to chapter 437 5 shall be assessed shall be calculated in accordance with the 6 methods provided herein, except that any references to ten 7 percent in this subsection shall be eight percent. 8 (2) (1) For valuations established on or after January 1, 9 2013, property valued by the department of revenue pursuant to 10 chapter 434 shall be assessed at a portion of its actual value 11 determined in the same manner at which property assessed as 12 commercial property is assessed under paragraph âbâ for the same 13 assessment year. 14 (3) (2) For valuations established for the assessment year 15 beginning January 1, 2025, and each assessment year thereafter, 16 the percentage of actual value at which property valued by the 17 department of revenue pursuant to chapters 428 , 437, and 438 18 shall be assessed shall be ninety-eight one hundred percent. 19 (4) For valuations established for the assessment year 20 beginning January 1, 2026, the percentage of actual value at 21 which property valued by the department of revenue pursuant 22 to chapters 428 and 438 shall be assessed shall be ninety-six 23 percent. 24 (5) For valuations established for the assessment year 25 beginning January 1, 2027, the percentage of actual value at 26 which property valued by the department of revenue pursuant to 27 chapters 428 and 438 shall be assessed shall be ninety-four 28 percent. 29 (6) For valuations established for the assessment year 30 beginning January 1, 2028, the percentage of actual value at 31 which property valued by the department of revenue pursuant 32 to chapters 428 and 438 shall be assessed shall be ninety-two 33 percent. 34 (7) For valuations established on or after January 1, 2029, 35 -37- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 37/ 85 S.F. 651 the percentage of actual value at which property valued by the 1 department of revenue pursuant to chapters 428 and 438 shall be 2 assessed shall be ninety percent. 3 b. For valuations established on or after January 1, 2013, 4 commercial Commercial property, excluding properties referred 5 to in section 427A.1, subsection 9 , shall be assessed at a 6 portion of its actual value, as determined in this paragraph 7 âbâ . 8 (1) For valuations established for the assessment year 9 beginning January 1, 2013, the percentage of actual value 10 as equalized by the department of revenue as provided in 11 section 441.49 at which commercial property shall be assessed 12 shall be ninety-five percent. For valuations established 13 for the assessment year beginning January 1, 2014, and each 14 assessment year thereafter beginning before January 1, 2022, 15 the percentage of actual value as equalized by the department 16 of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which commercial 17 property shall be assessed shall be ninety percent. 18 (2) (1) For valuations established for the assessment year 19 beginning January 1, 2022, and each assessment year thereafter 20 beginning before January 1, 2025 , the portion of actual value 21 at which each property unit of commercial property shall be 22 assessed shall be the sum of the following: 23 (a) An amount equal to the product of the assessment 24 limitation percentage applicable to residential property under 25 subsection 4 for that assessment year multiplied by the actual 26 value of the property that exceeds zero dollars but does not 27 exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars. 28 (b) An amount equal to ninety percent of the actual value of 29 the property for that assessment year that exceeds one hundred 30 fifty thousand dollars. 31 (2) For valuations established for the assessment year 32 beginning January 1, 2025, and each assessment year thereafter, 33 the percentage of actual value as equalized by the department 34 of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which commercial 35 -38- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 38/ 85 S.F. 651 property shall be assessed shall be one hundred percent. 1 c. For valuations established on or after January 1, 2013, 2 industrial Industrial property, excluding properties referred 3 to in section 427A.1, subsection 9 , shall be assessed at a 4 portion of its actual value, as determined in this paragraph 5 âcâ . 6 (1) For valuations established for the assessment year 7 beginning January 1, 2013, the percentage of actual value 8 as equalized by the department of revenue as provided in 9 section 441.49 at which industrial property shall be assessed 10 shall be ninety-five percent. For valuations established 11 for the assessment year beginning January 1, 2014, and each 12 assessment year thereafter beginning before January 1, 2022, 13 the percentage of actual value as equalized by the department 14 of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which industrial 15 property shall be assessed shall be ninety percent. 16 (2) (1) For valuations established for the assessment year 17 beginning January 1, 2022, and each assessment year thereafter 18 beginning before January 1, 2025 , the portion of actual value 19 at which each property unit of industrial property shall be 20 assessed shall be the sum of the following: 21 (a) An amount equal to the product of the assessment 22 limitation percentage applicable to residential property under 23 subsection 4 for that assessment year multiplied by the actual 24 value of the property that exceeds zero dollars but does not 25 exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars. 26 (b) An amount equal to ninety percent of the actual value of 27 the property for that assessment year that exceeds one hundred 28 fifty thousand dollars. 29 (2) For valuations established for the assessment year 30 beginning January 1, 2025, and each assessment year thereafter, 31 the percentage of actual value as equalized by the department 32 of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which industrial 33 property shall be assessed shall be one hundred percent. 34 d. For valuations established for the assessment year 35 -39- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 39/ 85 S.F. 651 beginning January 1, 2019, and each assessment year thereafter 1 beginning before January 1, 2025 , the percentages or portions 2 of actual value at which property is assessed, as determined 3 under this subsection , shall not be applied to the value of 4 wind energy conversion property valued under section 427B.26 5 the construction of which is approved by the Iowa utilities 6 commission on or after July 1, 2018. 7 e. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2023, 8 there is appropriated from the general fund of the state to 9 the department of revenue the sum of one hundred twenty-two 10 million three hundred fifty thousand dollars to be used 11 for payments under this paragraph calculated as a result 12 of the assessment limitations imposed under paragraph âbâ , 13 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), and paragraph 14 âcâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a). For each 15 fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2024, but before 16 July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the general fund of 17 the state to the department of revenue the sum of one hundred 18 twenty-five million dollars to be used for payments under this 19 paragraph calculated as a result of the assessment limitations 20 imposed under paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph 21 division (a), Code 2025, and paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (2), 22 subparagraph division (a) , Code 2025 . 23 (2) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2023, but 24 before July 1, 2026, each county treasurer shall be paid by the 25 department of revenue an amount calculated under subparagraph 26 (4) for the applicable fiscal year . If an amount appropriated 27 for the fiscal year is insufficient to make all payments as 28 calculated under subparagraph (4), the director of revenue 29 shall prorate the payments to the county treasurers and shall 30 notify the county auditors of the pro rata percentage on or 31 before September 30. 32 (3) On or before July 1 of each applicable fiscal year, the 33 assessor shall report to the county auditor that portion of the 34 total actual value of all commercial property and industrial 35 -40- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 40/ 85 S.F. 651 property in the county that is subject to the assessment 1 limitations imposed under paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), 2 subparagraph division (a), Code 2025, and paragraph âcâ , 3 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), Code 2025, for the 4 assessment year used to calculate the taxes due and payable in 5 that fiscal year. 6 (4) On or before September 1 of each applicable fiscal year, 7 the county auditor shall prepare a statement, based on the 8 report received in subparagraph (3) and information transmitted 9 to the county auditor under chapter 434 , listing for each 10 taxing district in the county: 11 (a) The product of the portion of the total actual value 12 of all commercial property, industrial property, and property 13 valued by the department under chapter 434 in the county 14 that is subject to the assessment limitations imposed under 15 paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), 16 Code 2025, and paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph 17 division (a), Code 2025, for the applicable assessment year 18 used to calculate taxes which are due and payable in the 19 applicable fiscal year multiplied by the difference, stated 20 as a percentage, between ninety percent and the assessment 21 limitation percentage applicable to residential property under 22 subsection 4 for the applicable assessment year. 23 (b) The tax levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed 24 value for each taxing district for the applicable fiscal year. 25 (c) The amount of the payment for each county is equal to 26 the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph division (a), 27 multiplied by the tax rate specified in subparagraph division 28 (b), and then divided by one thousand dollars. 29 (5) The county auditor shall certify and forward one copy of 30 the statement described in subparagraph (4) to the department 31 of revenue not later than September 1 of each fiscal year. 32 (6) The amounts determined under this paragraph shall 33 be paid by the department to the county treasurers in equal 34 installments in September and March of each year. The county 35 -41- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 41/ 85 S.F. 651 treasurer shall apportion the payments among the eligible 1 taxing districts in the county and the amounts received by each 2 taxing authority shall be treated the same as property taxes 3 paid. 4 f. For the purposes of this subsection , unless the context 5 otherwise requires: 6 (1) âContiguous parcelsâ means any of the following: 7 (a) Parcels that share a common boundary. 8 (b) Parcels within the same building or structure 9 regardless of whether the parcels share a common boundary. 10 (c) Permanent improvements to the land that are situated 11 on one or more parcels of land that are assessed and taxed 12 separately from the permanent improvements if the parcels of 13 land upon which the permanent improvements are situated share 14 a common boundary. 15 (2) âParcelâ means the same as defined in section 445.1 . 16 âParcelâ also means that portion of a parcel assigned a 17 classification of commercial property or industrial property 18 pursuant to section 441.21, subsection 14, paragraph âbâ , Code 19 2025 . 20 (3) âProperty unitâ means a parcel or contiguous parcels 21 all of which are located within the same county, with the same 22 property tax classification, are owned by the same person, and 23 are operated by that person for a common use and purpose. 24 Sec. 57. Section 441.21, subsection 8, paragraph b, Code 25 2025, is amended to read as follows: 26 b. Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , any construction or 27 installation of a solar energy system on property classified 28 as agricultural, residential, multiresidential, commercial, or 29 industrial property shall not increase the actual, assessed, 30 and taxable values of the property for five full assessment 31 years. 32 Sec. 58. Section 441.21, subsections 9 and 10, Code 2025, 33 are amended to read as follows: 34 9. Not later than November 1, 1979 2025 , and November 35 -42- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 42/ 85 S.F. 651 1 of each subsequent year, the director shall certify to 1 the county auditor of each county the percentages of actual 2 value at which residential property, agricultural property, 3 commercial property, industrial property, property valued by 4 the department of revenue pursuant to chapters 428 and 438, 5 property valued by the department of revenue pursuant to 6 chapter 434, and property valued by the department of revenue 7 pursuant to chapter 437 in each assessing jurisdiction in 8 the county each classification of property shall be assessed 9 for taxation , including for assessment years beginning on 10 or after January 1, 2022, the percentages used to apply the 11 assessment limitations under subsection 5, paragraphs âbâ 12 and âcâ . The county auditor shall proceed to determine the 13 assessed values of agricultural property, residential property, 14 commercial property, industrial property, property valued by 15 the department of revenue pursuant to chapters 428 and 438, 16 property valued by the department of revenue pursuant to 17 chapter 434, and property valued by the department of revenue 18 pursuant to chapter 437 by applying such percentages to the 19 current actual value of such property, as reported to the 20 county auditor by the assessor, and the assessed values so 21 determined shall be the taxable values of such properties upon 22 which the levy shall be made. 23 10. The percentages percentage of actual value computed by 24 the department of revenue under subsection 4 for agricultural 25 property , residential property, commercial property, industrial 26 property, property valued by the department of revenue pursuant 27 to chapters 428 and 438 , property valued by the department of 28 revenue pursuant to chapter 434 , and property valued by the 29 department of revenue pursuant to chapter 437 , including for 30 assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the 31 percentages used to apply the assessment limitations under 32 subsection 5 , paragraphs âbâ and âcâ , and used to determine 33 assessed values of those classes of agricultural property 34 do does not constitute a rule as defined in section 17A.2, 35 -43- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 43/ 85 S.F. 651 subsection 11 . 1 Sec. 59. Section 441.21, subsection 13, paragraph a, 2 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 Beginning with valuations established on or after January 5 1, 2016 2026 , but before January 1, 2022, all of the following 6 shall be valued as a separate class of property known as 7 multiresidential property and, excluding properties referred 8 to in section 427A.1, subsection 9 , shall be assessed at 9 a percentage of its actual value, as determined in this 10 subsection : 11 Sec. 60. Section 441.21, subsection 13, paragraph b, Code 12 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 13 lieu thereof the following: 14 b. (1) For valuations established for the assessment year 15 beginning January 1, 2026, the percentage of actual value as 16 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 17 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 18 shall be seventy-five percent. 19 (2) For valuations established for the assessment year 20 beginning January 1, 2027, the percentage of actual value as 21 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 22 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 23 shall be seventy-seven and one-half percent. 24 (3) For valuations established for the assessment year 25 beginning January 1, 2028, the percentage of actual value as 26 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 27 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 28 shall be eighty percent. 29 (4) For valuations established for the assessment year 30 beginning January 1, 2029, the percentage of actual value as 31 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 32 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 33 shall be eighty-two and one-half percent. 34 (5) For valuations established for the assessment year 35 -44- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 44/ 85 S.F. 651 beginning January 1, 2030, the percentage of actual value as 1 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 2 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 3 shall be eighty-five percent. 4 (6) For valuations established for the assessment year 5 beginning January 1, 2031, the percentage of actual value as 6 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 7 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 8 shall be eighty-seven and one-half percent. 9 (7) For valuations established for the assessment year 10 beginning January 1, 2032, the percentage of actual value as 11 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 12 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 13 shall be ninety percent. 14 (8) For valuations established for the assessment year 15 beginning January 1, 2033, the percentage of actual value as 16 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 17 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 18 shall be ninety-two and one-half percent. 19 (9) For valuations established for the assessment year 20 beginning January 1, 2034, the percentage of actual value as 21 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 22 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 23 shall be ninety-five percent. 24 (10) For valuations established for the assessment year 25 beginning January 1, 2035, the percentage of actual value as 26 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 27 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 28 shall be ninety-seven and one-half percent. 29 (11) For valuations established for the assessment 30 year beginning January 1, 2036, and each assessment year 31 thereafter, the percentage of actual value as equalized by 32 the department of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at 33 which multiresidential property shall be assessed shall be one 34 hundred percent. 35 -45- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 45/ 85 S.F. 651 Sec. 61. Section 441.21, subsection 13, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. Beginning with valuations established on or after 3 January 1, 2016 2026 , but before January 1, 2022, for parcels 4 for which a portion of the parcel satisfies the requirements 5 for classification as multiresidential property pursuant to 6 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (5) or (6), the assessor shall 7 assign to that portion of the parcel the classification 8 of multiresidential property and to such other portions of 9 the parcel the property classification for which such other 10 portions qualify. 11 Sec. 62. Section 441.21, subsection 13, Code 2025, is 12 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. For purposes of equalization under 14 sections 441.47 through 441.49, multiresidential property shall 15 be considered residential property. 16 Sec. 63. Section 441.21, subsection 14, Code 2025, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 14. a. Beginning with valuations established on or after 19 January 1, 2022 2026 , all of the following property primarily 20 used or intended for human habitation containing two or fewer 21 dwelling units shall be classified and valued as residential 22 property : . 23 (1) Property primarily used or intended for human 24 habitation containing two or fewer dwelling units. 25 (2) Mobile home parks. 26 (3) Manufactured home communities. 27 (4) Land-leased communities. 28 (5) Assisted living facilities. 29 (6) A parcel primarily used or intended for human habitation 30 containing three or more separate dwelling units. If a 31 portion of such a parcel is used or intended for a purpose 32 that, if the primary use, would be classified as commercial 33 property or industrial property, each such portion, including 34 a proportionate share of the land included in the parcel, if 35 -46- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 46/ 85 S.F. 651 applicable, shall be assigned the appropriate classification 1 pursuant to paragraph âbâ . 2 (7) For a parcel that is primarily used or intended for use 3 as commercial property or industrial property, that portion 4 of the parcel that is used or intended for human habitation, 5 regardless of the number of dwelling units contained on the 6 parcel, including a proportionate share of the land included 7 in the parcel, if applicable. The portion of such a parcel 8 used or intended for use as commercial property or industrial 9 property, including a proportionate share of the land included 10 in the parcel, if applicable, shall be assigned the appropriate 11 classification pursuant to paragraph âbâ . 12 b. Beginning with valuations established on or after 13 January 1, 2022, for parcels for which a portion of the parcel 14 satisfies the requirements for classification as residential 15 property pursuant to paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (6) or (7), 16 the assessor shall assign to that portion of the parcel the 17 classification of residential property and to such other 18 portions of the parcel the property classification for which 19 such other portions qualify. 20 c. Property that is rented or leased to low-income 21 individuals and families as authorized by section 42 of the 22 Internal Revenue Code , and that has not been withdrawn from 23 section 42 assessment procedures under subsection 2 of this 24 section , or a hotel, motel, inn, or other building where rooms 25 or dwelling units are usually rented for less than one month 26 shall not be classified as residential property under this 27 subsection . 28 d. As used in this subsection : 29 (1) âAssisted living facilityâ means property for providing 30 assisted living as defined in section 231C.2 . âAssisted living 31 facilityâ also includes a health care facility, as defined in 32 section 135C.1 , an elder group home, as defined in section 33 231B.1 , a child foster care facility under chapter 237 , or 34 property used for a hospice program as defined in section 35 -47- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 47/ 85 S.F. 651 135J.1 . 1 (2) âDwelling unitâ means an apartment, group of rooms, 2 or single room which is occupied as separate living quarters 3 or, if vacant, is intended for occupancy as separate living 4 quarters, in which a tenant can live and sleep separately from 5 any other persons in the building. 6 (3) âLand-leased communityâ means the same as defined in 7 sections 335.30A and 414.28A . 8 (4) âManufactured home communityâ means the same as a 9 land-leased community. 10 (5) âMobile home parkâ means the same as defined in section 11 435.1 . 12 Sec. 64. Section 558.46, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. For the purposes of this section, 15 âresidential propertyâ includes multiresidential property. 16 Sec. 65. SAVINGS PROVISION. This division of this Act, 17 pursuant to section 4.13, does not affect the operation of, 18 or prohibit the application of, prior provisions of section 19 441.21, or rules adopted under chapter 17A to administer prior 20 provisions of section 441.21, for assessment years beginning 21 before January 1, 2025, or for duties, powers, protests, 22 appeals, proceedings, actions, or remedies attributable to an 23 assessment year beginning before January 1, 2025, including 24 property taxes due and payable in a fiscal year as the result 25 of an assessment year beginning before January 1, 2025. 26 Sec. 66. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following take effect January 27 1, 2026: 28 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 29 386.8. 30 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 31 386.9. 32 3. The section of this division of this Act amending section 33 386.10. 34 4. The section of this division of this Act amending section 35 -48- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 48/ 85 S.F. 651 404.2, subsection 2, paragraph âfâ. 1 5. The section of this division of this Act amending section 2 404.3, subsection 4, paragraph âaâ. 3 6. The section of this division of this Act amending section 4 404.3A. 5 7. The section of this division of this Act amending section 6 404.3D. 7 8. The section of this division of this Act amending section 8 441.21, subsection 2. 9 9. The section of this division of this Act amending section 10 441.21, subsection 8, paragraph âbâ. 11 10. The sections of this division of this Act amending 12 section 441.21, subsection 13. 13 11. The section of this division of this Act amending 14 section 441.21, subsection 14. 15 12. The section of this division of this Act amending 16 section 558.46. 17 Sec. 67. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. Except as otherwise 18 provided in this division of this Act, this division of this 19 Act applies retroactively to assessment years beginning on or 20 after January 1, 2025. 21 Sec. 68. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to assessment 22 years beginning on or after January 1, 2026: 23 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 24 386.8. 25 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 26 386.9. 27 3. The section of this division of this Act amending section 28 386.10. 29 4. The section of this division of this Act amending section 30 404.2, subsection 2, paragraph âfâ. 31 5. The section of this division of this Act amending section 32 404.3, subsection 4, paragraph âaâ. 33 6. The section of this division of this Act amending section 34 404.3A. 35 -49- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 49/ 85 S.F. 651 7. The section of this division of this Act amending section 1 404.3D. 2 8. The section of this division of this Act amending section 3 441.21, subsection 2. 4 9. The section of this division of this Act amending section 5 441.21, subsection 8, paragraph âbâ. 6 10. The sections of this division of this Act amending 7 section 441.21, subsection 13. 8 11. The section of this division of this Act amending 9 section 441.21, subsection 14. 10 12. The section of this division of this Act amending 11 section 558.46. 12 DIVISION V 13 DISABLED VETERAN AND HOMESTEAD CREDITS AND EXEMPTIONS 14 Sec. 69. Section 25B.7, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 15 2025, is amended to read as follows: 16 a. Homestead tax credit pursuant to section 425.1 , and 17 sections 425.2 through 425.13 , and section 425.15 . 18 Sec. 70. Section 425.1, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 19 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 20 following: 21 2. a. The homestead credit fund shall be apportioned each 22 year so as to give a credit against the tax on each eligible 23 homestead in the state equal to the amounts specified pursuant 24 to paragraph âbâ or âcâ , as applicable. 25 b. (1) If the owner of a homestead allowed a credit under 26 this subchapter is any of the following, the homestead credit 27 allowed on the homestead shall be the entire amount of tax 28 levied on the homestead: 29 (a) A veteran of any of the military forces of the United 30 States who acquired the homestead under 38 U.S.C. Â§21.801, 31 21.802 prior to August 6, 1991, or under 38 U.S.C. Â§2101, 2102. 32 (b) A veteran as defined in section 35.1 with a permanent 33 service-connected disability rating of one hundred percent, as 34 certified by the United States department of veterans affairs, 35 -50- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 50/ 85 S.F. 651 or a permanent and total disability rating based on individual 1 unemployability that is compensated at the one hundred percent 2 disability rate, as certified by the United States department 3 of veterans affairs. 4 (c) A former member of the national guard of any state 5 who otherwise meets the service requirements of section 35.1, 6 subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2) or (7), with a 7 permanent service-connected disability rating of one hundred 8 percent, as certified by the United States department of 9 veterans affairs, or a permanent and total disability rating 10 based on individual unemployability that is compensated at the 11 one hundred percent disability rate, as certified by the United 12 States department of veterans affairs. 13 (d) An individual who is a surviving spouse or a child and 14 who is receiving dependency and indemnity compensation pursuant 15 to 38 U.S.C. Â§1301 et seq., as certified by the United States 16 department of veterans affairs. 17 (2) (a) For an owner described in subparagraph (1), 18 subparagraph division (a), (b), or (c), the credit allowed 19 shall be continued to the estate of an owner who is deceased 20 or the surviving spouse and any child, as defined in section 21 234.1, who are the beneficiaries of a deceased owner, so long 22 as the surviving spouse remains unmarried. 23 (b) An individual described in subparagraph (1), 24 subparagraph division (d), is no longer eligible for the credit 25 upon termination of dependency and indemnity compensation under 26 38 U.S.C. Â§1301 et seq. 27 (3) An owner or a beneficiary of an owner who elects to 28 secure the credit provided in this paragraph is not eligible 29 for the credit provided in paragraph âcâ or any other real 30 property tax credit or exemption provided by law for veterans 31 of military service. 32 (4) If an owner acquires a different homestead, the 33 credit allowed under this paragraph may be claimed on the new 34 homestead unless the owner fails to meet the other requirements 35 -51- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 51/ 85 S.F. 651 of this paragraph. 1 (5) (a) Except as provided in subparagraph division (b), 2 the list of the names and addresses of individuals allowed 3 a credit under this paragraph and maintained by the county 4 recorder, county treasurer, county assessor, city assessor, or 5 other government body is confidential information and shall 6 not be disseminated to any person unless otherwise ordered by 7 a court or released by the lawful custodian of the records 8 pursuant to state or federal law. The county recorder, county 9 treasurer, county assessor, city assessor, or other government 10 body responsible for maintaining the names and addresses 11 of individuals allowed a credit under this paragraph may 12 display such credit on individual paper records and individual 13 electronic records, including display on an internet site. 14 (b) Upon request, a county recorder, county assessor, city 15 assessor, or other entity may share information as described in 16 subparagraph division (a) to a county veterans service officer 17 for purposes of providing information on benefits and services 18 available to veterans and their families. 19 (6) (a) For an owner who makes an application to secure 20 the credit provided in this paragraph before July 1, 2025, 21 and for the beneficiary of such an owner, âhomesteadâ shall 22 mean the same as defined in section 425.11 for each succeeding 23 assessment year. 24 (b) For an owner who makes an application to secure the 25 credit provided in this paragraph on or after July 1, 2025, and 26 for the beneficiary of such an owner, âhomesteadâ shall mean the 27 same as provided in section 425.11, except the homestead shall 28 not include appurtenances and shall not exceed one-half acre. 29 (7) For purposes of this paragraph, âpermanent and total 30 disability rating based on individual unemployabilityâ means 31 a condition under which a person has either a permanent 32 service-connected disability rating of sixty percent or two or 33 more permanent service-connected disability conditions in which 34 one of the conditions has at least a forty percent rating and 35 -52- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 52/ 85 S.F. 651 the combined rating for all the conditions is at least seventy 1 percent, and the person has an administrative adjustment added 2 to the service-connected disability rating, due to individual 3 unemployability, such that the United States department of 4 veterans affairs rates the veteran permanently and totally 5 disabled for purposes of disability compensation. 6 c. (1) For assessment years beginning prior to January 7 1, 2025, unless eligible under section 425.15, Code 2025, an 8 amount equal to the actual levy on the first four thousand 9 eight hundred fifty dollars of actual value for each homestead. 10 (2) For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2025, 11 and each assessment year thereafter, unless eligible under 12 paragraph âbâ , zero. 13 Sec. 71. Section 425.1A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 14 to read as follows: 15 1. The following exemptions from taxation shall be allowed 16 in addition to the homestead credit exemption under subsection 17 1A for an owner that has attained the age of sixty-five years 18 by January 1 of the assessment year: 19 a. For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2023, the 20 eligible homestead, not to exceed three thousand two hundred 21 fifty dollars in taxable value. 22 b. For the assessment year years beginning on or after 23 January 1, 2024, and each succeeding assessment year, the 24 eligible homestead, not to exceed six thousand five hundred 25 dollars in taxable value. 26 Sec. 72. Section 425.1A, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 27 following new subsection: 28 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. For each assessment year beginning 29 on or after January 1, 2025, an exemption from taxation 30 of twenty-five percent of taxable value, not to exceed an 31 exemption of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars in 32 taxable value, shall be allowed on each eligible homestead in 33 addition to the exemption under subsection 1, if applicable. 34 Sec. 73. Section 425.2, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2025, are 35 -53- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 53/ 85 S.F. 651 amended to read as follows: 1 1. A person who wishes to qualify for the homestead credit 2 or exemption allowed under this subchapter shall obtain the 3 appropriate forms for filing for the credit from the assessor. 4 The forms shall include the ability to claim the credit under 5 section 425.1 and the exemptions under section 425.1A. 6 However, a separate form shall be required for claiming a 7 credit under section 425.1, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ . The 8 person claiming the credit or exemption shall file a verified 9 statement and designation of homestead with the assessor for 10 the year for which the person is first claiming the credit 11 or exemption . The claim shall be filed not later than July 12 1 of the year for which the person is claiming the credit or 13 exemption . A claim filed after July 1 of the year for which the 14 person is claiming the credit or exemption shall be considered 15 as a claim filed for the following year. 16 2. Upon the filing and allowance of the claim, the claim 17 shall be allowed on that homestead for successive years without 18 further filing as long as the property is legally or equitably 19 owned and used as a homestead by that person or that personâs 20 spouse on July 1 of each of those successive years, and the 21 owner of the property being claimed as a homestead declares 22 residency in Iowa for purposes of income taxation, and the 23 property is occupied by that person or that personâs spouse 24 for at least six months in each of those calendar years in 25 which the fiscal year begins. When the property is sold or 26 transferred, the buyer or transferee who wishes to qualify 27 shall refile for the credit or exemption . However, when the 28 property is transferred as part of a distribution made pursuant 29 to chapter 598 , the transferee who is the spouse retaining 30 ownership of the property is not required to refile for the 31 credit or exemption . Property divided pursuant to chapter 598 32 shall not be modified following the division of the property. 33 An owner who ceases to use a property for a homestead or 34 intends not to use it as a homestead for at least six months in 35 -54- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 54/ 85 S.F. 651 a calendar year shall provide written notice to the assessor 1 by July 1 following the date on which the use is changed. A 2 person who sells or transfers a homestead or the personal 3 representative of a deceased person who had a homestead at the 4 time of death, shall provide written notice to the assessor 5 that the property is no longer the homestead of the former 6 claimant. 7 Sec. 74. Section 425.2, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 8 by striking the subsection. 9 Sec. 75. Section 425.2, subsections 5 and 6, Code 2025, are 10 amended to read as follows: 11 5. Any person sixty-five years of age or older or any person 12 who is disabled may request, in writing, from the appropriate 13 assessor forms for filing for homestead tax credit . Any 14 person sixty-five years of age or older or who is disabled 15 may complete the form, which shall include a statement of 16 homestead, and mail or return it to the appropriate assessor. 17 The signature of the claimant on the statement shall be 18 considered the claimantâs acknowledgment that all statements 19 and facts entered on the form are correct to the best of the 20 claimantâs knowledge. 21 6. Upon adoption of a resolution by the county board 22 of supervisors, any person may request, in writing, from 23 the appropriate assessor forms for the filing for homestead 24 tax credit . The person may complete the form, which shall 25 include a statement of homestead, and mail or return it to 26 the appropriate assessor. The signature of the claimant on 27 the statement of homestead shall be considered the claimantâs 28 acknowledgment that all statements and facts entered on the 29 form are correct to the best of the claimantâs knowledge. 30 Sec. 76. Section 425.8, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 1. The director of revenue shall prescribe the form 33 for the making of a verified statement and designation of 34 homestead, the form for the supporting affidavits required 35 -55- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 55/ 85 S.F. 651 herein, and such other forms as may be necessary for the proper 1 administration of this subchapter . Whenever necessary, the 2 department of revenue shall forward to the county auditors of 3 the several counties in the state the prescribed sample forms, 4 and the county auditors shall furnish blank forms prepared in 5 accordance therewith with the assessment rolls, books, and 6 supplies delivered to the assessors. The department of revenue 7 shall prescribe and the county auditors shall provide on the 8 forms for claiming the homestead credit a statement to the 9 effect that the owner realizes that the owner must give written 10 notice to the assessor when the owner changes the use of the 11 property. 12 Sec. 77. Section 425.11, subsection 1, paragraph d, 13 subparagraph (1), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended 14 to read as follows: 15 The homestead includes the dwelling house which the owner, 16 in good faith, is occupying as a home on July 1 of the year for 17 which the credit or exemption is claimed and occupies as a home 18 for at least six months during the calendar year in which the 19 fiscal year begins, except as otherwise provided. 20 Sec. 78. Section 425.11, subsection 1, paragraph d, 21 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 22 (3) It must not embrace more than one dwelling house, but 23 where a homestead has more than one dwelling house situated 24 thereon, the exemption and or credit provided for in this 25 subchapter shall apply to the home and buildings used by the 26 owner, but shall not apply to any other dwelling house and 27 buildings appurtenant. 28 Sec. 79. Section 425.11, subsection 1, paragraph e, 29 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 30 (2) For the purpose of this subchapter , the word âownerâ 31 shall be construed to mean a bona fide owner and not one for 32 the purpose only of availing the person of the benefits of this 33 subchapter . In order to qualify for the homestead tax credit 34 and or exemption, evidence of ownership shall be on file in the 35 -56- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 56/ 85 S.F. 651 office of the clerk of the district court or recorded in the 1 office of the county recorder at the time the owner files with 2 the assessor a verified statement of the homestead claimed by 3 the owner as provided in section 425.2 . 4 Sec. 80. Section 483A.24, subsection 19, Code 2025, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 19. Upon payment of a fee established by rules adopted 7 pursuant to section 483A.1 for a lifetime trout fishing 8 license, the department shall issue a lifetime trout fishing 9 license to a person who is at least sixty-five years of age or 10 to a person who qualifies for the disabled veteran homestead 11 credit under section 425.15 425.1, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ . 12 The department shall prepare an application to be used by a 13 person requesting a lifetime trout fishing license under this 14 subsection . 15 Sec. 81. REPEAL. Section 425.15, Code 2025, is repealed. 16 Sec. 82. IMPLEMENTATION. Homestead owners who have filed 17 for or that are receiving homestead credits or exemptions under 18 chapter 425, subchapter I, before the effective date of this 19 division of this Act shall continue to receive such credits and 20 exemptions for which the owner is eligible for assessment years 21 beginning on or after January 1, 2025, without refiling, and, 22 if the owner is eligible, shall receive the exemption under 23 section 425.1A, subsection 1A, as enacted in this division of 24 this Act, without filing for such exemption. 25 Sec. 83. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 26 Act applies retroactively to assessment years beginning on or 27 after January 1, 2025. 28 DIVISION VI 29 MILITARY SERVICE PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION 30 Sec. 84. Section 426A.11, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 31 amended to read as follows: 32 2. a. The property, not to exceed one thousand eight 33 hundred fifty-two dollars in taxable value for assessment years 34 beginning before January 1, 2023, of an honorably separated, 35 -57- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 57/ 85 S.F. 651 retired, furloughed to a reserve, placed on inactive status, 1 or discharged veteran, as defined in section 35.1, subsection 2 2 , paragraph âaâ or âbâ . 3 b. The property, not to exceed four thousand dollars in 4 taxable value for the assessment years beginning on or after 5 January 1, 2023, but before January 1, 2025, of an honorably 6 separated, retired, furloughed to a reserve, placed on inactive 7 status, or discharged veteran, as defined in section 35.1, 8 subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ or âbâ . 9 c. The property, not to exceed the following amounts in 10 taxable value, of an honorably separated, retired, furloughed 11 to a reserve, placed on inactive status, or discharged veteran, 12 as defined in section 35.1, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ or âbâ : 13 (1) Five thousand dollars in taxable value for the 14 assessment year beginning January 1, 2025. 15 (2) Six thousand dollars in taxable value for the assessment 16 year beginning January 1, 2026. 17 (3) Seven thousand dollars in taxable value for assessment 18 years beginning on or after January 1, 2027. 19 Sec. 85. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 20 Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2025, for assessment 21 years beginning on or after that date. 22 DIVISION VII 23 HOSPITAL AND EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PROPERTY TAX LEVIES 24 Sec. 86. Section 347.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 25 following new subsection: 26 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. a. For fiscal years beginning on 27 or after July 1, 2026, any property tax levy imposed for a 28 county hospital under this chapter that is limited by law to 29 a specific property tax levy rate per one thousand dollars of 30 assessed value shall not exceed a levy rate per one thousand 31 dollars of assessed value that is equal to one thousand 32 multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing the product of 33 the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the current fiscal 34 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy by 35 -58- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 58/ 85 S.F. 651 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 1 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 2 valuation. 3 b. For purposes of this subsection, âbudget adjustment 4 factorâ , âbudget yearâ , âcurrent fiscal yearâ , and ânew 5 valuationâ mean the same as defined in section 331.423. 6 Sec. 87. Section 347A.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 7 following new subsection: 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. For fiscal years beginning on 9 or after July 1, 2026, any property tax levy imposed for a 10 county hospital under this chapter that is limited by law to 11 a specific property tax levy rate per one thousand dollars of 12 assessed value shall not exceed a levy rate per one thousand 13 dollars of assessed value that is equal to one thousand 14 multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing the product of 15 the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the current fiscal 16 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy by 17 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 18 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 19 valuation. 20 b. For purposes of this subsection, âbudget adjustment 21 factorâ , âbudget yearâ , âcurrent fiscal yearâ , and ânew 22 valuationâ mean the same as defined in section 331.423. 23 Sec. 88. Section 357F.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 24 following new subsection: 25 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. For fiscal years beginning on 26 or after July 1, 2026, any property tax levy imposed for 27 the district under this chapter that is limited by law to a 28 specific property tax levy rate per one thousand dollars of 29 assessed value shall not exceed a levy rate per one thousand 30 dollars of assessed value that is equal to one thousand 31 multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing the product of 32 the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the current fiscal 33 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy by 34 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 35 -59- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 59/ 85 S.F. 651 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 1 valuation. 2 b. For purposes of this subsection, âbudget adjustment 3 factorâ , âbudget yearâ , âcurrent fiscal yearâ , and ânew 4 valuationâ mean the same as defined in section 331.423. 5 Sec. 89. Section 357G.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. For fiscal years beginning on 8 or after July 1, 2026, any property tax levy imposed for 9 the district under this chapter that is limited by law to a 10 specific property tax levy rate per one thousand dollars of 11 assessed value shall not exceed a levy rate per one thousand 12 dollars of assessed value that is equal to one thousand 13 multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing the product of 14 the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the current fiscal 15 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy by 16 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 17 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 18 valuation. 19 b. For purposes of this subsection, âbudget adjustment 20 factorâ , âbudget yearâ , âcurrent fiscal yearâ , and ânew 21 valuationâ mean the same as defined in section 384.1. 22 Sec. 90. NEW SECTION . 422D.5A Levy limitation. 23 1. For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2026, any 24 property tax levy imposed under this chapter that is limited 25 by law to a specific property tax levy rate per one thousand 26 dollars of assessed value shall not exceed a levy rate per 27 one thousand dollars of assessed value that is equal to one 28 thousand multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing the 29 product of the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the 30 current fiscal yearâs actual property tax dollars certified 31 for such levy by the remainder of the total assessed value 32 used to calculate such taxes for the budget year minus value 33 attributable to new valuation. 34 2. For purposes of this section, âbudget adjustment factorâ , 35 -60- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 60/ 85 S.F. 651 âbudget yearâ , âcurrent fiscal yearâ , and ânew valuationâ mean 1 the same as defined in section 331.423. 2 DIVISION VIII 3 PROPERTY TAX LEVY RATES 4 Sec. 91. Section 176A.10, subsection 1, paragraphs a, b, c, 5 d, and e, Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs and 6 inserting in lieu thereof the following: 7 a. For an extension district having a population of less 8 than thirty thousand, an annual levy of fifteen cents per 9 thousand dollars of the assessed valuation of the taxable 10 property in the district up to a maximum of two hundred 11 ninety-one thousand dollars payable during the fiscal year 12 commencing July 1, 2026, and an increase of six thousand 13 dollars in the amount payable during each subsequent fiscal 14 year. 15 b. For an extension district having a population of thirty 16 thousand or more but less than fifty thousand, an annual 17 levy of ten and one-eighth cents per thousand dollars of the 18 assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district 19 up to a maximum of three hundred forty-two thousand dollars 20 payable during the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2026, and an 21 increase of seven thousand dollars in the amount payable during 22 each subsequent fiscal year. 23 c. For an extension district having a population of fifty 24 thousand or more but less than ninety thousand, an annual levy 25 of six and three-fourths cents per thousand dollars of the 26 assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district up 27 to a maximum of four hundred thirty-six thousand five hundred 28 dollars payable during the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2026, 29 and an increase of nine thousand dollars in the amount payable 30 during each subsequent fiscal year. 31 d. For an extension district having a population of ninety 32 thousand or more but less than two hundred thousand, an annual 33 levy of six and three-fourths cents per thousand dollars of 34 the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district 35 -61- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 61/ 85 S.F. 651 up to a maximum of six hundred ninety thousand dollars payable 1 during the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2026, and an increase 2 of fifteen thousand dollars in the amount payable during each 3 subsequent fiscal year. 4 e. For an extension district having a population of two 5 hundred thousand or more, an annual levy of two and one-half 6 cents per thousand dollars of the assessed valuation of 7 the taxable property in the district up to a maximum of one 8 million fifty thousand dollars payable during the fiscal 9 year commencing July 1, 2026, and an increase of twenty-five 10 thousand dollars in the amount payable during each subsequent 11 fiscal year. 12 Sec. 92. Section 176A.10, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 13 amended by striking the subsection. 14 Sec. 93. Section 312.2, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 15 2025, is amended to read as follows: 16 a. The treasurer of state, before making any allotments 17 to counties under this section , shall reduce the allotment to 18 a county for the secondary road fund by the amount by which 19 the total funds that the county transferred or provided during 20 the prior fiscal year under section 331.429, subsection 1 , 21 paragraphs âaâ , âbâ , âdâ , and âeâ , are less than seventy-five 22 fifty-one percent of the sum of the following: 23 (1) From the general fund of the county, the dollar 24 equivalent of a tax of sixteen and seven-eighths eleven and 25 thirteen-sixteenths cents per thousand dollars of assessed 26 value on all taxable property in the county. 27 (2) From the rural services fund of the county, the dollar 28 equivalent of a tax of three two dollars and three-eighths of a 29 cent ten and twenty-one eightieths cents per thousand dollars 30 of assessed value on all taxable property not located within 31 the corporate limits of a city in the county. 32 Sec. 94. NEW SECTION . 444.25 Maximum property tax levy 33 rates ââ adjustments. 34 1. For purposes of this section: 35 -62- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 62/ 85 S.F. 651 a. âBudget yearâ is the fiscal year beginning during the 1 calendar year in which a budget is certified. 2 b. âCurrent fiscal yearâ is the fiscal year ending during 3 the calendar year in which a budget for the budget year is 4 certified. 5 c. âRate-limited property tax levyâ includes any ad valorem 6 property tax levy limited by law to a specific property tax 7 levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value used to 8 calculate taxes, but does not include the school district 9 foundation levy under section 257.3, the county general 10 services levy under section 331.423, subsection 1, the county 11 rural services levy under section 331.423, subsection 2, the 12 city general fund levy under section 384.1, subsection 3, 13 the physical plant and equipment levies under section 298.2, 14 the school district bond tax under section 298.18, any levy 15 under chapter 28M, a levy under section 384.12, subsection 16 1, paragraph âbâ , levied for operation and maintenance of 17 a regional transit district, a levy for the office of the 18 assessor under section 441.16, any levy under chapter 347 or 19 347A, any levy under chapter 386, and any levy under chapter 20 357F, 357G, or 422D. In addition, ârate-limited property tax 21 levyâ does not include levy rates used in the calculations under 22 section 312.2, subsection 5, paragraph âaâ . 23 2. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, each 24 rate-limited property tax levy may only be imposed if the 25 governmental entity imposed such levy for the fiscal year 26 beginning July 1, 2025, and shall, by operation of this 27 section, be limited to a levy rate per one thousand dollars 28 of assessed value that is equal to one thousand multiplied by 29 the quotient of one hundred two percent of the current fiscal 30 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy 31 divided by the total assessed value used to calculate such 32 taxes for the budget year, but not less than a levy rate per one 33 thousand dollars of assessed value that results in an amount 34 of actual property tax dollars certified for levy for such 35 -63- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 63/ 85 S.F. 651 levy equal to one hundred and one-half percent of the actual 1 property tax dollars certified for such levy for the fiscal 2 year beginning July 1, 2025. 3 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and each 4 fiscal year thereafter, rate-limited property tax levies may 5 be imposed by any governmental entity otherwise authorized by 6 law, regardless of whether the governmental entity imposed the 7 levy for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, at rates not 8 to exceed those established by the general assembly by statute 9 following receipt and consideration of the report submitted by 10 the legislative interim committee requested to be established 11 by the legislative council in this division of this Act. 12 Sec. 95. NEW SECTION . 444.26 Use of bonds and indebtedness 13 for general operations ââ prohibition. 14 1. For purposes of this section, âgeneral operationsâ means 15 services or activities generally funded from the governmental 16 entityâs general fund, which are necessary for the operation 17 of the governmental entity, including salaries and benefits, 18 or which are for the health and welfare of the governmental 19 entityâs citizens or primarily intended to benefit all 20 residents of the governmental entity, but excluding services 21 financed by statutory funds other than a debt service fund. 22 2. On or after July 1, 2025, a city or county shall not 23 issue bonds or other indebtedness payable from an ad valorem 24 property tax levy for the purpose of funding the general 25 operations of the city or general operations of the county, as 26 applicable, or otherwise use proceeds from the sale of bonds or 27 issuance of other indebtedness to fund general operations. 28 3. The city finance committee shall adopt rules under 29 chapter 17A for cities to implement this section. The county 30 finance committee shall adopt rules under chapter 17A for 31 counties to implement this section. 32 Sec. 96. PROPERTY TAXATION RATES ââ STUDY COMMITTEE. 33 1. a. The legislative council is requested to establish 34 a legislative study committee during the 2025 legislative 35 -64- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 64/ 85 S.F. 651 interim and the 2026 legislative interim to examine appropriate 1 rates of property taxation imposed by governmental entities 2 following the adjustments to assessment limitations and levy 3 rate limitations made in this Act, determine an alternative 4 methodology and period of time to increase the percentage of 5 actual value at which residential and multiresidential property 6 are subject to tax under section 441.21, subsections 4 and 13, 7 from seventy-five percent to one hundred percent, and examine 8 the imposition and administration of replacement taxes under 9 chapters 437A and 437B. 10 b. The study committee shall consist of the following voting 11 members of the general assembly: 12 (1) Two members of the senate appointed by the majority 13 leader of the senate. 14 (2) One member of the senate appointed by the minority 15 leader of the senate. 16 (3) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by 17 the speaker of the house of representatives. 18 (4) One member of the house of representatives appointed by 19 the minority leader of the house of representatives. 20 2. The committee shall make recommendations to and file a 21 report with the general assembly relating to the appropriate 22 rates of property taxation imposed by governmental entities 23 and appropriate assessment limitations for residential and 24 multiresidential property following enactment of this Act, no 25 later than January 15, 2027. 26 Sec. 97. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following take effect January 27 1, 2026: 28 1. The sections of this division of this Act amending 29 section 176A.10. 30 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 31 312.2. 32 Sec. 98. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to fiscal years 33 beginning on or after July 1, 2026: 34 1. The sections of this division of this Act amending 35 -65- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 65/ 85 S.F. 651 section 176A.10. 1 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 2 312.2. 3 DIVISION IX 4 ELDERLY PROPERTY TAXES ââ LOW INCOME 5 Sec. 99. Section 425.17, subsection 2, paragraph a, 6 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 7 (3) A person filing a claim for credit under this subchapter 8 who has attained the age of seventy years on or before December 9 31 of the base year, who has a household income of less than two 10 three hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level, as 11 defined by the most recently revised poverty income guidelines 12 published by the United States department of health and human 13 services, and is domiciled in this state at the time the claim 14 is filed or at the time of the personâs death in the case of a 15 claim filed by the executor or administrator of the claimantâs 16 estate. 17 Sec. 100. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 18 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 19 Sec. 101. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 20 Act applies retroactively to assessment years beginning on or 21 after January 1, 2025. 22 DIVISION X 23 BRUCELLOSIS AND TUBERCULOSIS ERADICATION FUND ââ LEVY 24 Sec. 102. Section 165.18, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2025, 25 are amended by striking the subsections. 26 Sec. 103. Section 331.512, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 27 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 28 Sec. 104. Section 331.559, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 29 amended by striking the subsection. 30 Sec. 105. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 31 effect upon enactment. 32 Sec. 106. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 33 to property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on 34 or after July 1, 2025. 35 -66- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 66/ 85 S.F. 651 DIVISION XI 1 OFFICE OF THE ASSESSOR ââ BUDGET AND LEVY 2 Sec. 107. Section 441.16, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 3 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 4 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. For fiscal years beginning on or after 5 July 1, 2026, expenses of the office of the assessor, the 6 examining board, and the board of review related to duties 7 or expenses authorized to be paid using funds levied under 8 sections 97B.9 and 97C.10, and insurance expenses, tort claims, 9 and judgments of such offices and boards shall not be paid from 10 the levy under subsection 5. 11 Sec. 108. Section 441.16, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 12 2025, is amended to read as follows: 13 a. (1) (a) Any For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 14 2026, any tax for the maintenance of the office of assessor 15 and other assessment procedure shall be levied only upon the 16 property in the area assessed by the assessor, and such tax 17 levy shall not exceed sixty-seven and one-half cents per 18 thousand dollars of assessed value in the assessing area. 19 (b) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, any tax for 20 the maintenance of the office of assessor and other assessment 21 procedure shall be levied only upon the property in the area 22 assessed by the assessor, and such tax levy shall not exceed 23 a rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value in the 24 assessing area that is equal to one thousand multiplied by 25 the quotient of one hundred two percent of the current fiscal 26 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy, 27 excluding the amounts attributable to the types of expenses 28 described in subsection 2, paragraph âcâ , divided by the total 29 assessed value used to calculate such taxes for the budget 30 year. 31 (c) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2027, 32 any tax for the maintenance of the office of assessor and other 33 assessment procedure shall be levied only upon the property in 34 the area assessed by the assessor, and such tax levy shall not 35 -67- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 67/ 85 S.F. 651 exceed a rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value in 1 the assessing area that is equal to one thousand multiplied by 2 the quotient of one hundred two percent of the current fiscal 3 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy 4 divided by the total assessed value used to calculate such 5 taxes for the budget year. 6 (d) For purposes of this subparagraph, âbudget yearâ and 7 âcurrent fiscal yearâ mean the same as defined in section 8 331.423. 9 (2) The county treasurer shall credit the sums received 10 from such levy to a separate fund to be known as the assessment 11 expense fund and from which fund all expenses incurred under 12 this chapter shall be paid. In the case of a county where there 13 is more than one assessor the treasurer shall maintain separate 14 assessment expense funds for each assessor. 15 Sec. 109. Section 441.16, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 16 amended to read as follows: 17 6. The assessor shall not issue requisitions so as to 18 increase the total expenditures budgeted for the operation of 19 the assessorâs office. However, for purposes of promoting 20 operational efficiency, the assessor shall , except as provided 21 in subsection 2, paragraph âcâ , have authority to transfer 22 funds budgeted for specific items for the operation of the 23 assessorâs office from one unexpended balance to another; such 24 transfer shall not be made so as to increase the total amount 25 budgeted for the operation of the office of assessor, and no 26 funds shall be used to increase the salary of the assessor or 27 the salaries of permanent deputy assessors. The assessor shall 28 issue requisitions for the examining board and for the board of 29 review on order of the chairperson of each board and for costs 30 and expenses incident to assessment appeals, only on order of 31 the city legal department, in the case of cities and of the 32 county attorney in the case of counties. 33 Sec. 110. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 34 effect January 1, 2026. 35 -68- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 68/ 85 S.F. 651 Sec. 111. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 1 to property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on 2 or after July 1, 2026. 3 DIVISION XII 4 REGIONAL TRANSIT DISTRICT LEVY 5 Sec. 112. Section 28M.5, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 1. a. The commission, with the approval of the board of 8 supervisors of participating counties and the city council 9 of participating cities in the chapter 28E agreement, may , 10 subject to paragraph âbâ , levy annually a tax not to exceed 11 ninety-five eighty cents per thousand dollars of the assessed 12 value of all taxable property in a regional transit district 13 to the extent provided in this section . The chapter 28E 14 agreement may authorize the commission to levy the tax at 15 different rates within the participating cities and counties in 16 amounts sufficient to meet the revenue responsibilities of such 17 cities and counties as allocated in the budget adopted by the 18 commission. However, for a city participating in a regional 19 transit district, the total of all the tax levies imposed in 20 the city pursuant to section 384.12, subsection 1 , paragraph 21 âbâ , and this section shall not exceed the aggregate of 22 ninety-five eighty cents per thousand dollars of the assessed 23 value of all taxable property in the participating city. 24 b. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 25 2026, the sum of property tax dollars levied for the regional 26 transit district under this subsection and property tax dollars 27 received by the regional transit district from participating 28 cities and counties shall not exceed an amount equal to one 29 hundred two percent of the sum of property tax dollars levied 30 for the regional transit district under this subsection for 31 the immediately preceding fiscal year and property tax dollars 32 received by the regional transit district from participating 33 cities and counties for the immediately preceding fiscal year. 34 Sec. 113. Section 384.12, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 35 -69- LSB 2982SV (2) 91 jm/md 69/ 85 S.F. 651 amended to read as follows: 1 1. a. A tax for the operation and maintenance of a 2 municipal transit system or for operation and maintenance of a 3 regional transit district, and for the creation of a reserve 4 fund for the system or district, in an amount not to exceed 5 ninety-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value each 6 year, when the revenues from the transit system or district are 7 insufficient for such purposes. 8 b. A tax for the operation and maintenance of a regional 9 transit district, and for the creation of a reserve fund for 10 the district under chapter 28M, in an amount not to exceed 11 eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value each year, 12 when the revenues from the district are insufficient for such 13 purposes. 14 Sec. 114. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 15 effect January 1, 2026. 16 Sec. 115. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 17 to property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on 18 or after July 1, 2026. 19